Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


Charleston, South
Carolina, in Ruins,
 April 1865 Rebel troops evacuating Charleston blew up military supplies to deny them to General William Tecumseh Sherman’s forces. The explosions ignited ﬁres that all but destroyed the city.

 The moonlight-and-magnolia Old South, largely imaginary in any case, had forever gone with the wind. Handsome cities of yesteryear, such as Charleston and Richmond, were rubble-strewn and weed-choked. An Atlantan returned to his once-fair hometown and remarked, “Hell has laid her egg, and right here it hatched.” Economic life had creaked to a halt. Banks and businesses had locked their doors, ruined by runaway inﬂation. Factories were smokeless, silent, dismantled. The transportation system had broken down completely. Before the war ﬁve different railroad lines had converged on Columbia, South Carolina; now the nearest connected track was twenty-nine miles away. Efforts to untwist the rails corkscrewed by Sherman’s soldiers proved bumpily unsatisfactory. Agriculture—the economic lifeblood of the South— was almost hopelessly crippled. Once-white cotton ﬁelds now yielded a lush harvest of nothing but green weeds. The slave-labor system had collapsed, seed was scarce, and livestock had been driven off by plundering Yankees. Pathetic instances were reported of men hitching themselves to plows, while women and children gripped the handles. Not until 1870 did the se-

 ceded states produce as large a cotton crop as that of the fateful year 1860, and much of that yield came from new acreage in the Southwest. The princely planter aristocrats were humbled by the war—at least temporarily. Reduced to proud poverty, they faced charred and gutted mansions, lost investments, and almost worthless land. Their investments of more than $2 billion in slaves, their primary form of wealth, had evaporated with emancipation. Beaten but unbent, many high-spirited white Southerners remained dangerously deﬁant. They cursed the “damnyankees” and spoke of “your government” in Washington instead of “our government.” One Southern bishop refused to pray for President Andrew Johnson, though Johnson proved to be in sore need of divine guidance. Conscious of no crime, these former Confederates continued to believe that their view of secession was correct and that the “lost cause” was still a just war. One popular anti-Union song ran, I’m glad I fought agin her, I only wish we’d won, And I ain’t axed any pardon for anything I’ve done. Such attitudes boded ill for the prospects of painlessly binding up the Republic’s wounds.

From Slavery to Freedom


 Freedmen Deﬁne Freedom Confusion abounded in the still-smoldering South about the precise meaning of “freedom” for blacks. Emancipation took effect haltingly and unevenly in different parts of the conquered Confederacy. As Union armies marched in and out of various localities, many blacks found themselves emancipated and then reenslaved. A North Carolina slave estimated that he had celebrated freedom about twelve times. Blacks from one Texas county ﬂeeing to the free soil of the liberated county next door were attacked by slaveowners as they swam across the river that marked the county line. The next day trees along the riverbank were bent with swinging corpses—a grisly warning to others dreaming of liberty. Other planters resisted emancipation more legalistically, stubbornly protesting that slavery was lawful until state legislatures or the Supreme Court declared otherwise. For many slaves the shackles of bondage were not struck off in a single mighty blow; long-suffering blacks often had to wrench free of their chains link by link. The variety of responses to emancipation, by whites as well as blacks, illustrated the sometimes startling complexity of the master-slave relationship. Loyalty to



 the plantation master prompted some slaves to resist the liberating Union armies, while other slaves’ pentup bitterness burst forth violently on the day of liberation. Many newly emancipated slaves, for example, joined Union troops in pillaging their masters’ possessions. In one instance a group of Virginia slaves laid twenty lashes on the back of their former master—a painful dose of his own favorite medicine. Prodded by the bayonets of Yankee armies of occupation, all masters were eventually forced to recognize their slaves’ permanent freedom. The oncecommanding planter would assemble his former human chattels in front of the porch of the “big house” and announce their liberty. Though some blacks initially responded to news of their emancipation with suspicion and uncertainty, they soon celebrated their newfound freedom. Many took new names in place of the ones given by their masters and demanded that whites formally address them as “Mr.” or “Mrs.” Others abandoned the coarse cottons that had been their only clothing as slaves and sought silks, satins, and other ﬁ nery. Though many whites perceived such behavior as insubordinate, they were forced to recognize the realities of emancipation. “Never before had I a word of impudence from any of our black folk,” wrote one white Southerner, “but they are not ours any longer.”

The Day of Jubilo This French
 illustration of “Emancipated Negroes Celebrating the Emancipation Proclamation” may have been somewhat fanciful, but it captured well the exhilaration that came with freedom.



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


Educating Young Freedmen and Freedwomen,
 1870s Freed slaves in the South regarded schooling as the key to improving their children’s lives and the fulﬁllment of a long-sought right that had been denied blacks in slavery. These well-dressed schoolchildren are lined up outside their rural, one-room schoolhouse alongside their teachers, both black and white.

 Houston H. Holloway, age twenty at the time of his emancipation, recalled his feelings upon hearing of his freedom:

“


 I felt like a bird out of a cage. Amen. Amen. Amen. I could hardly ask to feel any better than I did that day. . . . The week passed off in a blaze of glory.

”


 The reunion of long-lost relatives also inspired joy; one Union ofﬁcer wrote home,

“


 Men are taking their wives and children, families which had been for a long time broken up are united and oh! such happiness. I am glad I am here.

”


 Tens of thousands of emancipated blacks took to the roads, some to test their freedom, others to search for long-lost spouses, parents, and children. Emancipation thus strengthened the black family, and many newly freed men and women formalized “slave marriages” for personal and pragmatic reasons, including the desire to make their children legal heirs. Other blacks left their former masters to work in towns and cities, where existing black communities provided protection and mutual assistance. Whole communities sometimes moved together in search of opportunity. From 1878 to 1880, some twenty-ﬁve thousand blacks from Louisiana, Texas, and Mississippi surged in a mass exodus to Kansas. The westward ﬂood of these “Exodusters” was stemmed only when steamboat captains refused to transport more black migrants across the Mississippi River. The church became the focus of black community life in the years following emancipation. As slaves, blacks had worshiped alongside whites, but now they formed their own churches pastored by their own ministers. Black churches grew robustly. The 150,000member black Baptist Church of 1850 reached 500,000 by 1870, while the African Methodist Episcopal Church

 Letter from a Freedman to His Old Master, 1865 hat was it like to experience the transition from slavery to freedom? Four million Southern blacks faced this exhilarating and formidable prospect with the end of the war. For historians, recovering the African American perspective on emancipation is challenging. Unlike their white masters, freed blacks left few written records. But one former slave captured in a letter to his “Old Master” (whose surname he bore) the heroic determination of many blacks to build new independent and digniﬁed lives for themselves and their families. During the war Jourdon Anderson escaped slavery in Tennessee with his wife and two daughters. After relocating to the relative safety of Ohio, he received a communication from his former owner asking him to return. In his bold reply, reportedly “dictated by the old servant” himself, Anderson expressed his family’s new expectations for life as free people and an uneasiness about his former master’s intentions. He made reference to his “comfortable home,” his daughters’ schooling, the church that he and his wife were free to attend regularly, and the peace of mind that came with knowing that “my girls [would not be] brought to shame by the violence and wickedness of their young masters.” To test the white man’s sincerity, Anderson and his wife asked for the astronomical ﬁgure of $11,680 in back wages from decades as slaves. He closed by reiterating that “the great desire of my life is to give my children an education and have them form virtuous habits.” This rare letter demonstrates that many black correspondents may have been illiterate, but they were hardly inarticulate. And they asserted themselves as parents, workers, and citizens not only from the distance of a former free state like Ohio but also deep within the former slave states of the South. Was the tone of Anderson’s letter (and postscript) serious or tonguein-cheek? What did “freedom” mean for Anderson and other blacks in the months following emancipation? How did the eventual accomplishments of Reconstruction correspond with the initial expectations of people like Anderson and his former owner?

W






Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 quadrupled in size from 100,000 to 400,000 in the ﬁ rst decade after emancipation. These churches formed the bedrock of black community life, and they soon gave rise to other benevolent, fraternal, and mutual aid societies. All these orga ni zations helped blacks protect their newly won freedom. Emancipation also meant education for many blacks. Learning to read and write had been a privilege generally denied to them under slavery. Freedmen wasted no time establishing societies for self-improvement, which undertook to raise funds to purchase land, build schoolhouses, and hire teachers. One member of a North Carolina education society asserted that “a schoolhouse would be the ﬁ rst proof of their independence.” Southern blacks soon found, however, that the demand outstripped the supply of qualiﬁed black teachers. They accepted the aid of Northern white women sent by the American Missionary Association, who volunteered their ser vices as teachers. They also turned to the federal government for help. The freed blacks were going to need all the friends—and power— they could muster in Washington.

 The Freedmen’s Bureau Abolitionists had long preached that slavery was a degrading institution. Now the emancipators were faced with the brutal reality that the freedmen were overwhelmingly unskilled, unlettered, without property or money, and with scant knowledge of how to survive as free people. To cope with this problem throughout the conquered South, Congress created the Freedmen’s Bureau on March 3, 1865. On paper at least, the bureau was intended to be a kind of primitive welfare agency. It was to provide food, clothing, medical care, and education both to freedmen and to white refugees. Heading the bureau was a

 Women from the North enthusiastically embraced the opportunity to go south and teach in Freedmen’s Bureau schools for emancipated blacks. One volunteer explained her motives:

“


 I thought I must do something, not having money at my command, what could I do but give myself to the work. . . . I would go to them, and give them my life if necessary.

”


 warmly sympathetic friend of blacks, Union general Oliver O. Howard, who later founded and served as president of Howard University in Washington, D.C. The bureau achieved its greatest successes in education. It taught an estimated 200,000 blacks how to read. Many former slaves had a passion for learning, partly because they wanted to close the gap between themselves and whites and partly because they longed to read the Word of God. In one elementary class in North Carolina sat four generations of the same family, ranging from a six-year-old child to a seventy-ﬁve-yearold grandmother. But in other areas, the bureau’s accomplishments were meager—or even mischievous. Although the bureau was authorized to settle former slaves on forty-acre tracts conﬁscated from the Confederates, little land actually made it into blacks’ hands. Instead local administrators often collaborated with planters in expelling blacks from towns and cajoling them into signing labor contracts to work for their former masters. Still, the white South resented the bureau as a meddlesome federal interloper that threatened to upset white racial dominance. President Andrew Johnson, who shared the white supremacist views of most white Southerners, repeatedly tried to kill it, and it expired in 1872.

Johnson: The Tailor President
 Few presidents have ever been faced with a more perplexing sea of troubles than that confronting Andrew Johnson. What manner of man was this medium-built, dark-eyed, black-haired Tennessean, now chief executive by virtue of the bullet that killed Lincoln? No citizen, not even Lincoln, has ever reached the White House from humbler beginnings. Born to impoverished parents in North Carolina and orphaned early, Johnson never attended school but was apprenticed to a tailor at age ten. Ambitious to get ahead, he taught himself to read, and later his wife taught him to write and do simple arithmetic. Like many another self-made man, he was inclined to overpraise his maker. Johnson early became active in politics in Tennessee, where he had moved when seventeen years old. He shone as an impassioned champion of poor whites against the planter aristocrats, although he himself ultimately owned a few slaves. He excelled as a two-ﬁsted stump speaker before angry and heckling crowds, who on occasion greeted his political oratory with cocked pistols, not just cocked ears. Elected to Congress, he attracted much favorable attention in the

 Johnson's Plans for the South



Crushed by the Constitution
 President Andrew Johnson revered the U.S. Constitution but eventually felt its awesome weight in his impeachment trial.

 North (but not the South) when he refused to secede with his own state. After Tennessee was partially “redeemed” by Union armies, he was appointed war governor and served courageously in an at mosphere of danger. Political exigency next thrust Johnson into the vice presidency. Lincoln’s Union party in 1864 needed to attract support from the War Democrats and other proSouthern elements, and Johnson, a Democrat, seemed to be the ideal man. Unfortunately, he appeared at the vice-presidential inaugural ceremonies the following March in a scandalous condition. He had recently been afﬂ icted with typhoid fever, and although not known as a heavy drinker, he was urged by his friends to take a stiff bracer of whiskey. This he did—with unfortunate results. “Old Andy” Johnson was no doubt a man of parts— unpolished parts. He was intelligent, able, forceful, and gifted with homespun honesty. Steadfastly devoted to duty and to the people, he was a dogmatic champion of states’ rights and the Constitution. He would often present a copy of the document to visitors, and he was buried with one as a pillow. Yet the man who had raised himself from the tailor’s bench to the president’s chair was a misﬁt. A Southerner who did not understand the North, a Tennessean who had earned the distrust of the South, a Democrat who had never been accepted by the Republicans, a president who had never been elected to the

 ofﬁce, he was not at home in a Republican White House. Hotheaded, contentious, and stubborn, he was the wrong man in the wrong place at the wrong time. A Reconstruction policy devised by angels might well have failed in his tactless hands.

Presidential Reconstruction
 Even before the shooting war had ended, the political war over Reconstruction had begun. Abraham Lincoln believed that the Southern states had never legally withdrawn from the Union. Their formal restoration to the Union would therefore be relatively simple. Accordingly, Lincoln in 1863 proclaimed his “10 percent” Reconstruction plan. It decreed that a state could be reintegrated into the Union when 10 percent of its voters in the presidential election of 1860 had taken an oath of allegiance to the United States and pledged to abide by emancipation. The next step would be formal erection of a state government. Lincoln would then recognize the puriﬁed regime. Lincoln’s proclamation provoked a sharp reaction in Congress, where Republicans feared the restoration of the planter aristocracy to power and the possible reenslavement of blacks. Republicans therefore rammed through Congress in 1864 the Wade-Davis Bill. The bill required that 50 percent of a state’s voters take the oath of allegiance and demanded stronger safeguards for



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 emancipation than Lincoln’s as the price of readmission to the Union. Lincoln “pocket-vetoed” this bill by refusing to sign it after Congress had adjourned. Republicans were outraged. They refused to seat delegates from Louisiana after that state had reorga nized its government in accordance with Lincoln’s 10 percent plan in 1864. The controversy surrounding the Wade-Davis Bill had revealed deep differences between the president and Congress. Unlike Lincoln, many in Congress insisted that the seceders had indeed left the Union—had “committed suicide” as republican states—and had therefore forfeited all their rights. They could be readmitted only as “conquered provinces” on such conditions as Congress should decree. This episode further revealed differences among Republicans. Two factions were emerging. The majority moderate group tended to agree with Lincoln that the seceded states should be restored to the Union as simply and swiftly as reasonable—though on Congress’s terms, not the president’s. The minority radical group believed that the South should atone more painfully for its sins. Before the South should be restored, the radicals wanted its social structure uprooted, the haughty planters punished, and the newly emancipated blacks protected by federal power. Some of the radicals were secretly pleased when the assassin’s bullet felled Lincoln, for the martyred president had shown tenderness toward the South. Spiteful “Andy” Johnson, who shared their hatred for the planter aristocrats, would presumably also share their desire to reconstruct the South with a rod of iron. Johnson soon disillusioned them. He agreed with Lincoln that the seceded states had never legally been outside the Union. Thus he quickly recognized several of Lincoln’s 10 percent governments, and on May 29, 1865, he issued his own Reconstruction proclamation (see Table 22.1). It disfranchised certain leading Con-

Before President Andrew Johnson (1808–1875)
 softened his Southern policy, his views were radical. Speaking on April 21, 1865, he declared,

“


 It is not promulgating anything that I have not heretofore said to say that traitors must be made odious, that treason must be made odious, that traitors must be punished and impoverished. They must not only be punished, but their social power must be destroyed. If not, they will still maintain an ascendancy, and may again become numerous and powerful; for, in the words of a former Senator of the United States, ‘When traitors become numerous enough, treason becomes respectable.’

”


 federates, including those with taxable property worth more than $20,000, though they might petition him for personal pardons. It called for special state conventions, which were required to repeal the ordinances of secession, repudiate all Confederate debts, and ratify the slave-freeing Thirteenth Amendment. States that complied with these conditions, Johnson declared, would be swiftly readmitted to the Union. Johnson, savoring his dominance over the hightoned aristocrats who now begged his favor, granted pardons in abundance. Bolstered by the political resurrection of the planter elite, the recently rebellious states moved rapidly in the second half of 1865 to organize governments. But as the pattern of the new governments became clear, Republicans of all stripes grew furious.

Table 22.1 Principal Reconstruction Proposals and Plans
Year


Proposal or Plan


1864–1865
1865–1866
1866–1867
1867–1877


 Lincoln’s 10 percent proposal Johnson’s version of Lincoln’s proposal Congressional plan: 10 percent plan with Fourteenth Amendment Congressional plan of military Reconstruction: Fourteenth Amendment plus black suffrage, later established nationwide by Fifteenth Amendment

The Black Codes


The Baleful Black Codes
 Among the ﬁ rst acts of the new Southern regimes sanctioned by Johnson was the passage of the iron-toothed Black Codes. These laws were designed to regulate the affairs of the emancipated blacks, much as the slave statutes had done in pre–Civil War days. Mississippi passed the ﬁ rst such law in November 1865, and other Southern states soon followed suit. The Black Codes varied in severity from state to state (Mississippi’s was the harshest and Georgia’s the most lenient), but they had much in common. The Black Codes aimed, ﬁ rst of all, to ensure a stable and subservient labor force. The crushed Cotton Kingdom could not rise from its weeds until the ﬁelds were once again put under hoe and plow—and many whites wanted to make sure that they retained the tight control they had exercised over black ﬁeld hands and plow drivers in the days of slavery. Dire penalties were therefore imposed by the codes on blacks who “jumped” their labor contracts, which usually committed them to work for the same employer for one year, and generally at pittance wages. Violators could be made to forfeit back wages or could be forcibly dragged back to work by a paid “Negro-catcher.” In Mississippi the captured freedmen could be ﬁ ned and then hired out to pay their ﬁ nes—an arrangement that closely resembled slavery itself.



 Early in 1866 one congressman quoted a Georgian:

“


 The blacks eat, sleep, move, live, only by the tolerance of the whites, who hate them. The blacks own absolutely nothing but their bodies; their former masters own everything, and will sell them nothing. If a black man draws even a bucket of water from a well, he must ﬁrst get the permission of a white man, his enemy. . . . If he asks for work to earn his living, he must ask it of a white man; and the whites are determined to give him no work, except on such terms as will make him a serf and impair his liberty.

”


 The codes also sought to restore as nearly as possible the pre-emancipation system of race relations. Freedom was legally recognized, as were some other privileges, such as the right to marry. But all the codes forbade a black to serve on a jury; some even barred blacks from renting or leasing land. A black could be punished for “idleness” by being sentenced to work on a chain gang. Nowhere were blacks allowed to vote. These oppressive laws mocked the ideal of freedom, so recently purchased by buckets of blood. The

Sharecroppers Picking Cotton
 Although many freed slaves found themselves picking cotton on their former masters’ plantations, they took comfort that they were at least paid wages and could work as a family unit. In time, however, they became ensnared in the web of debt that their planter bosses spun to keep a free labor force tightly bound to them.



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 Black Codes imposed terrible burdens on the unfettered blacks, struggling against mistreatment and poverty to make their way as free people. The worst features of the Black Codes would eventually be repealed, but their revocation could not by itself lift the liberated blacks into economic independence. Lacking capital, and with little to offer but their labor, thousands of impoverished former slaves slipped into the status of sharecropper farmers, as did many landless whites. Luckless sharecroppers gradually sank into a morass of virtual peonage and remained there for generations. Formerly slaves to masters, countless blacks as well as poorer whites in effect became slaves to the soil and to their creditors. Yet the dethroned planter aristocracy resented even this pitiful concession to freedom. Sharecropping was the “wrong policy,” said one planter. “It makes the laborer too independent; he becomes a partner, and has a right to be consulted.” The Black Codes made an ugly impression in the North. If the former slaves were being re-enslaved, people asked one another, had not the Boys in Blue spilled their blood in vain? Had the North really won the war?

Congressional Reconstruction
 These questions grew more insistent when the congressional delegations from the newly reconstituted Southern states presented themselves in the Capitol in December 1865. To the shock and disgust of the Republicans, many former Confederate leaders were on hand to claim their seats. The appearance of these ex-rebels was a natural but costly blunder. Voters of the South, seeking able representatives, had turned instinctively to their experienced statesmen. But most of the Southern leaders were tainted by active association with the “lost cause.” Among them were four former Confederate generals, ﬁve colonels, and various members of the Richmond cabinet and Congress. Worst of all, there was the shrimpy but brainy Alexander Stephens, ex–vice president of the Confederacy, still under indictment for treason. The presence of these “whitewashed rebels” infuriated the Republicans in Congress. The war had been fought to restore the Union, but not on these kinds of terms. The Republicans were in no hurry to embrace their former enemies—virtually all of them Democrats—in the chambers of the Capitol. While the South

 had been “out” from 1861 to 1865, the Republicans in Congress had enjoyed a relatively free hand. They had passed much legislation that favored the North, such as the Morrill Tariff, the Paciﬁc Railroad Act, and the Homestead Act. Now many Republicans balked at giving up this political advantage. On the ﬁ rst day of the congressional session, December 4, 1865, they banged shut the door in the face of the newly elected Southern delegations. Looking to the future, the Republicans were alarmed to realize that a restored South would be stronger than ever in national politics. Before the war a black slave had counted as three-ﬁ fths of a person in apportioning congressional representation. Now the slave was ﬁve-ﬁ fths of a person. Eleven Southern states had seceded and been subdued by force of arms. But now, owing to full counting of free blacks, the rebel states were entitled to twelve more votes in Congress, and twelve more presidential electoral votes, than they had previously enjoyed. Again, angry voices in the North raised the cry, Who won the war? Republicans had good reason to fear that ultimately they might be elbowed aside. Southerners might join hands with Democrats in the North and win control of Congress or maybe even the White House. If this happened, they could perpetuate the Black Codes, virtually re-enslaving blacks. They could dismantle the economic program of the Republican party by lowering tariffs, rerouting the transcontinental railroad, repealing the free-farm Homestead Act, and possibly even repudiating the national debt. President Johnson thus deeply disturbed the congressional Republicans when he announced on December 6, 1865, that the recently rebellious states had satisﬁed his conditions and that in his view the Union was now restored.

 Johnson Clashes with Congress A clash between president and Congress was now inevitable. It exploded into the open in February 1866, when the president vetoed a bill (later repassed) extending the life of the controversial Freedmen’s Bureau. Aroused, the Republicans swiftly struck back. In March 1866 they passed the Civil Rights Bill, which conferred on blacks the privilege of American citizenship and struck at the Black Codes. President Johnson resolutely vetoed this forward-looking mea sure on constitutional grounds, but in April congressmen steamrollered it over his veto—something they repeat-

Johnson Versus Congressional Republicans


 edly did henceforth. The hapless president, dubbed “Sir Veto” and “Andy Veto,” had his presidential wings clipped, as Congress increasingly assumed the dominant role in running the government. One critic called Johnson “the dead dog of the White House.” The Republicans now undertook to rivet the principles of the Civil Rights Bill into the Constitution as the Fourteenth Amendment. They feared that the Southerners might one day win control of Congress and repeal the hated law. The proposed amendment, approved by Congress and sent to the states in June 1866 and ratiﬁed in 1868, was sweeping. It (1) conferred civil rights, including citizenship but excluding the fran-



 chise, on the freedmen; (2) reduced proportionately the representation of a state in Congress and in the Electoral College if it denied blacks the ballot; (3) disqualiﬁed from federal and state ofﬁce former Confederates who as federal ofﬁceholders had once sworn “to support the Constitution of the United States”; and (4) guaranteed the federal debt, while repudiating all Confederate debts. (See the text of the Fourteenth Amendment in the Appendix.) The radical faction was disappointed that the Fourteenth Amendment did not grant the right to vote, but all Republicans were agreed that no state should be welcomed back into the Union fold without ﬁ rst ratifying the Fourteenth Amendment. Yet President Johnson advised the Southern states to reject it, and all of the “sinful eleven,” except Tennessee, deﬁantly spurned the amendment. Their spirit was reﬂected in a Southern song: And I don’t want no pardon for what I was or am, I won’t be reconstructed and I don’t give a damn.

Swinging ’Round the
 Circle with Johnson

 An Inﬂexible President, 1866 This Republican cartoon shows Johnson knocking blacks out of the Freedmen’s Bureau by his veto.

 As 1866 lengthened, the battle grew between the Congress and the president. The root of the controversy was Johnson’s “10 percent” governments that had passed the most stringent Black Codes. Congress had tried to temper the worst features of the codes by extending the life of the embattled Freedmen’s Bureau and passing the Civil Rights Bill. Both mea sures Johnson had vetoed. Now the issue was whether Reconstruction was to be carried on with or without the Fourteenth Amendment. The Republicans would settle for nothing less. The crucial congressional elections of 1866—more crucial than some presidential elections—were fast approaching. Johnson was naturally eager to escape from the clutch of Congress by securing a majority favorable to his soft-on-the-South policy. Invited to dedicate a Chicago monument to Stephen A. Douglas, he undertook to speak at various cities en route in support of his views. Johnson’s famous “swing ’round the circle,” beginning in the late summer of 1866, was a seriocomedy of errors. The president delivered a series of “give ’em hell” speeches, in which he accused the radicals in Congress of having planned large-scale antiblack riots and murder in the South. As he spoke, hecklers hurled insults at



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 him. Reverting to his stump-speaking days in Tennessee, he shouted back angry retorts, amid cries of “You be damned” and “Don’t get mad, Andy.” The dignity of his high ofﬁce sank to a new low, as the old charges of drunkenness were revived. As a vote-getter, Johnson was highly successful— for the opposition. His inept speechmaking heightened the cry “Stand by Congress” against the “Tailor of the Potomac.” When the ballots were counted, the Republicans had rolled up more than a two-thirds majority in both houses of Congress.

Republican Principles
 and Programs The Republicans now had a veto-proof Congress and virtually unlimited control of Reconstruction policy. But moderates and radicals still disagreed over the best course to pursue in the South.

Republicans Campaigning in
Baton Rouge, Louisiana, 1868
 The soldiers’ caps and regimental ﬂags demonstrate the continuing federal military presence in the Reconstruction South. Radical Republican congressman Thaddeus Stevens said that Reconstruction must “revolutionize Southern institutions, habits, and manners. . . . The foundation of their institutions . . . must be broken up and relaid, or all our blood and treasure have been spent in vain.”

 The radicals in the Senate were led by the courtly and principled idealist Charles Sumner, long since recovered from his prewar caning on the Senate ﬂoor, who tirelessly labored not only for black freedom but for racial equality. In the House the most powerful radical was Thaddeus Stevens, crusty and vindictive congressman from Pennsylvania. Seventy-four years old in 1866, he was a curious ﬁgure, with a protruding lower lip, a heavy black wig covering his bald head, and a deformed foot. An unswerving friend of blacks, he had defended runaway slaves in court without fee and, before dying, insisted on burial in a black cemetery. His affectionate devotion to blacks was matched by his vitriolic hatred of rebellious white Southerners. A masterly parliamentarian with a razor-sharp mind and withering wit, Stevens was a leading ﬁgure on the Joint (House-Senate) Committee on Reconstruction. Still opposed to rapid restoration of the Southern states, the radicals wanted to keep them out as long as possible and apply federal power to bring about a dras-

Military Reconstruction


 though the moderates, as the majority faction, had the upper hand. And one thing both groups had come to agree on by 1867 was the necessity to enfranchise black voters, even if it took federal troops to do it.

Representative Thaddeus Stevens (1792–1868), in
 a congressional speech on January 3, 1867, urged the ballot for blacks out of concern for them and out of bitterness against Southern whites:

“


 I am for Negro suffrage in every rebel state. If it be just, it should not be denied; if it be necessary, it should be adopted; if it be a punishment to traitors, they deserve it.

Reconstruction by the Sword


”


 tic social and economic transformation in the South. But moderate Republicans, more attuned to the timehonored principles of states’ rights and self-government, recoiled from the full implications of the radical program. They preferred policies that restrained the states from abridging citizens’ rights, rather than policies that directly involved the federal government in individual lives. The actual policies adopted by Congress showed the inﬂuence of both these schools of thought,

 Against a backdrop of vicious and bloody race riots that had erupted in several Southern cities, Congress passed the Reconstruction Act on March 2, 1867 (see Map 22.1). Supplemented by later mea sures, this drastic legislation divided the South into ﬁve military districts, each commanded by a Union general and policed by blue-clad soldiers, about twenty thousand all told. The act also temporarily disfranchised tens of thousands of former Confederates. Congress additionally laid down stringent conditions for the readmission of the seceded states. The wayward states were required to ratify the Fourteenth Amendment, giving the former slaves their rights as citizens. The bitterest pill of all to white Southerners

 Map 22.1 Military Reconstruction, 1867 (ﬁve districts and commanding generals) For many white Southerners, military Reconstruction amounted to turning the knife in the wound of defeat. An often-repeated story of later years had a Southerner remark, “I was sixteen years old before I discovered that damnyankee was two words.” Boundaries of the five Military Districts

 VA.

Interactive Map




MILITARY DISTRICT 1

 Tennessee escaped military regime.

 1870 Date refers to year of readmission to the Union

General Schofield


N.C.


 TENNESSEE

 ARKANSAS

MILITARY DISTRICT 4
General Ord 
 TEXAS

 MISS.

MILITARY DISTRICT 5
General Sheridan 


 ALABAMA

MILITARY DISTRICT 2

General Sickles


 GEORGIA



S.C.


MILITARY DISTRICT 3
General Pope 
 LOUISIANA

 FLORIDA



Years “Redeemer”
 governments established Established 1869 –1871 Established 1873 –1874 Established 1876 –1877

 Presidential electoral vote by party Independent Democratic Republican Democratic



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 was the stipulation that they guarantee in their state constitutions full suffrage for their former adult male slaves. Yet the act, reﬂecting moderate sentiment, stopped short of giving the freedmen land or education at federal expense. The overriding purpose of the moderates was to create an electorate in Southern states that would vote those states back into the Union on acceptable terms and thus free the federal government from direct responsibility for the protection of black rights. As later events would demonstrate, this approach proved woefully inadequate to the cause of justice for blacks. The radical Republicans were still worried. The danger loomed that once the unrepentant states were readmitted, they would amend their constitutions so as to withdraw the ballot from blacks. The only ironclad safeguard was to incorporate black suffrage in the federal Constitution. This goal was ﬁ nally achieved by the Fifteenth Amendment, passed by Congress in 1869 and ratiﬁed by the required number of states in 1870 (see the Appendix). Military Reconstruction of the South not only usurped certain functions of the president as commander in chief but set up a martial regime of dubious legality. The Supreme Court had already ruled, in the

 At a constitutional convention in Alabama, freed people afﬁrmed their rights in the following declaration:

“


 We claim exactly the same rights, privileges and immunities as are enjoyed by white men—we ask nothing more and will be content with nothing less. . . . The law no longer knows white nor black, but simply men, and consequently we are entitled to ride in public conveyances, hold ofﬁce, sit on juries and do everything else which we have in the past been prevented from doing solely on the ground of color.

”


 case Ex parte Milligan (1866), that military tribunals could not try civilians, even during wartime, in areas where the civil courts were open. Peacetime military rule seemed starkly contrary to the spirit of the Constitution. But the circumstances were extraordinary in the Republic’s history, and for the time being the Supreme Court avoided offending the Republican Congress.

Table 22.2 Southern Reconstruction by State


State


Readmitted to
Representation
 in Congress

Home Rule (Democratic
 or “Redeemer” Regime) Reestablished

Tennessee


July 24, 1866


Arkansas
North Carolina
Alabama
Florida


June 22, 1868
June 25, 1868
June 25, 1868
June 25, 1868




Louisiana
South Carolina
Virginia
Mississippi
Texas
Georgia


June 25, 1868
June 25, 1868
January 26, 1870
February 23, 1870
March 30, 1870
[June 25, 1868] July 15, 1870




Comments
 Ratiﬁed Fourteenth Amendment in 1866 and hence avoided military Reconstruction*

 Federal troops restationed in 1877, as result of Hayes-Tilden electoral bargain Same as Florida Same as Florida

 Readmitted June 25, 1868, but returned to military control after expulsion of blacks from legislature

 *For many years Tennessee was the only state of the secession to observe Lincoln’s birthday as a legal holiday. Many states in the South still observe the birthdays of Jefferson Davis and Robert E. Lee.

Amending the Constitution


 Prodded into line by federal bayonets, the Southern states got on with the task of constitution making. By 1870 all of them had reorga nized their governments and had been accorded full rights (see Table 22.2). The hated “bluebellies” remained until the new Republican regimes—usually called “radical” regimes—appeared to be ﬁ rmly entrenched. Yet when the federal troops ﬁnally left a state, its government swiftly passed back into the hands of white Redeemers, or “Home Rule” regimes, which were inevitably Democratic. Finally, in 1877, the last federal muskets were removed from state politics, and the “solid” Democratic South congealed.

No Women Voters
 The passage of the three Reconstruction-era Amendments—the Thirteenth, Fourteenth, and Fifteenth— delighted former abolitionists but deeply disappointed advocates of women’s rights. Women had played a prominent part in the prewar abolitionist movement and had often pointed out that both women and blacks lacked basic civil rights, especially the crucial right to vote. The struggle for black freedom and the crusade for women’s rights, therefore, were one and the same in the eyes of many women. Yet during the war, feminist leaders such as Elizabeth Cady Stanton and Susan B. Anthony had temporarily suspended their own demands and worked wholeheartedly for the cause of black emancipation. The Woman’s Loyal League had gathered nearly 400,000 signatures on petitions asking Congress to pass a constitutional amendment prohibiting slavery. Now, with the war ended and the Thirteenth Amendment passed, feminist leaders believed that their time had come. They reeled with shock, however,

 The prominent suffragist and abolitionist Susan B. Anthony (1820–1906) was outraged over the proposed exclusion of women from the Fourteenth Amendment. In a conversation with her former male allies Wendell Phillips and Theodore Tilton, she reportedly held out her arm and declared,

“


 Look at this, all of you. And hear me swear that I will cut off this right arm of mine before I will ever work for or demand the ballot for the negro and not the woman.

”




 when the wording of the Fourteenth Amendment, which deﬁ ned equal national citizenship, for the ﬁ rst time inserted the word male into the Constitution in referring to a citizen’s right to vote. Both Stanton and Anthony campaigned actively against the Fourteenth Amendment despite the pleas of Frederick Douglass, who had long supported woman suffrage but believed that this was “the Negro’s hour.” When the Fifteenth Amendment proposed to prohibit denial of the vote on the basis of “race, color, or previous condition of servitude,” Stanton and Anthony wanted the word sex added to the list. They lost this battle, too. Fifty years would pass before the Constitution granted women the right to vote.

The Realities of Radical
Reconstruction in the South
 Blacks now had freedom, of a sort. Their friends in Congress had only haltingly and somewhat belatedly secured the franchise for them. Both Presidents Lincoln and Johnson had proposed to give the ballot gradually to selected blacks who qualiﬁed for it through education, property ownership, or military ser vice. Moderate Republicans and even many radicals at ﬁ rst hesitated to bestow suffrage on the freedmen. The Fourteenth Amendment, in many ways the heart of the Republican program for Reconstruction, had fallen short of guaranteeing the right to vote. (It envisioned for blacks the same status as that of women—citizenship without voting rights.) But by 1867 hesitation had given way to a hard determination to enfranchise the former slaves wholesale and immediately, while thousands of white Southerners were being denied the vote. By glaring contrast, most of the Northern states, before ratiﬁcation of the Fifteenth Amendment in 1870, withheld the ballot from their tiny black minorities. White Southerners naturally concluded that the Republicans were hypocritical in insisting that blacks in the South be allowed to vote. Having gained their right to suffrage, Southern black men seized the initiative and began to organize politically. Their primary vehicle became the Union League, originally a pro-Union orga ni zation based in the North. Assisted by Northern blacks, freedmen turned the League into a network of political clubs that educated members in their civic duties and campaigned for Republican candidates. The league’s mission soon expanded to include building black churches and schools, representing black grievances before local



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


Freedmen Voting, Richmond,
 Virginia, 1871 The exercise of democratic rights by former slaves constituted a political and social revolution in the South and was bitterly resented by whites.

 employers and government, and recruiting militias to protect black communities from white retaliation. Though African American women did not obtain the right to vote, they too assumed new political roles. Black women faithfully attended the parades and rallies common in black communities during the early years of Reconstruction and helped assemble mass meetings in the newly constructed black churches. They even showed up at the constitutional conventions held throughout the South in 1867, monitoring the proceedings and participating in informal votes outside the convention halls. But black men elected as delegates to the state constitutional conventions held the greater political authority. They formed the backbone of the black political community. At the conventions, they sat down with whites to hammer out new state constitutions, which most importantly provided for universal male suffrage. Though the subsequent elections produced no black governors or majorities in state senates, black political participation expanded exponentially during Reconstruction. Between 1868 and 1876, fourteen black congressmen and two black senators, Hiram Revels and Blanche K. Bruce, both of Mississippi, served in Washington, D.C. Blacks also served in state governments as

 lieutenant governors and representatives, and in local governments as mayors, magistrates, sheriffs, and justices of the peace. The sight of former slaves holding ofﬁce deeply offended their onetime masters, who lashed out with particular fury at the freedmen’s white allies, labeling them scalawags and carpetbaggers. The so-called scalawags were Southerners, often former Unionists and Whigs. The former Confederates accused them, often with wild exaggeration, of plundering the treasuries of the Southern states through their political inﬂuence in the radical governments. The carpetbaggers, on the other hand, were supposedly sleazy Northerners who had packed all their worldly goods into a carpetbag suitcase at war’s end and had come South to seek personal power and proﬁt. In fact, most were former Union soldiers and Northern businessmen and professionals who wanted to play a role in modernizing the “New South.” How well did the radical regimes rule? The radical legislatures passed much desirable legislation and introduced many badly needed reforms. For the ﬁ rst time in Southern history, steps were taken toward establishing adequate public schools. Tax systems were streamlined; public works were launched; and property rights

Radical Reconstruction




Black Reconstruction
 A composite portrait of the ﬁrst black senators and representatives in the Forty-ﬁrst and Forty-second Congresses. Senator Hiram Revels, on the left, was elected in 1870 to the seat that had been occupied by Jefferson Davis when the South seceded.

 were guaranteed to women. Many welcome reforms were retained by the all-white “Redeemer” governments that later returned to power. Despite these achievements, graft ran rampant in many “radical” governments. This was especially true in South Carolina and Louisiana, where conscienceless promoters and other pocket-padders used politically inexperienced blacks as pawns. The worst “black-andwhite” legislatures purchased, as “legislative supplies,” such “stationery” as hams, perfumes, suspenders, bonnets, corsets, champagne, and a cofﬁ n. One “thrifty” carpetbag governor in a single year “saved” $100,000 from a salary of $8,000. Yet this sort of corruption was by no means conﬁ ned to the South in these postwar years. The crimes of the Reconstruction governments were no more outrageous than the scams and felonies being perpetrated in the North at the same time, especially in Boss Tweed’s New York.

The Ku Klux Klan
 Deeply embittered, some Southern whites resorted to savage mea sures against “radical” rule. Many whites resented the success and ability of black legislators as

 much as they resented alleged “corruption.” A number of secret orga ni zations mushroomed forth, the most notorious of which was the “Invisible Empire of the South,” or Ku Klux Klan, founded in Tennessee in 1866. Besheeted nightriders, their horses’ hooves mufﬂed, would approach the cabin of an “upstart” black and hammer on the door. In ghoulish tones one thirsty horseman would demand a bucket of water. Then, under pretense of drinking, he would pour it into a rubber attachment concealed beneath his mask and gown, smack his lips, and declare that this was the ﬁ rst water he had tasted since he was killed at the Battle of Shiloh. If fright did not produce the desired effect, force was employed. Such tomfoolery and terror proved partially effective. Many ex-bondsmen and white “carpetbaggers,” quick to take a hint, shunned the polls. Those stubborn souls who persisted in their “upstart” ways were ﬂogged, mutilated, or even murdered. In one Louisiana parish in 1868, whites in two days killed or wounded two hundred victims; a pile of twenty-ﬁve bodies was found half-buried in the woods. By such atrocious practices were blacks “kept in their place”—that is, down. The Klan became a refuge for numerous bandits and cutthroats. Any scoundrel could don a sheet.



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 Congress, outraged by this night-riding lawlessness, passed the harsh Force Acts of 1870 and 1871. Federal troops were able to stamp out much of the “lash law,” but by this time the Invisible Empire had already done its work of intimidation. Many of the outlawed groups continued their tactics in the guise of “dancing clubs,” “missionary societies,” and “riﬂe clubs.” White resistance undermined attempts to empower blacks politically. The white South, for many decades, openly ﬂouted the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments. Wholesale disfranchisement of blacks, starting conspicuously about 1890, was achieved by

 The following excerpt is part of a heartrending appeal to Congress in 1871 by a group of Kentucky blacks:

“


 We believe you are not familiar with the description of the Ku Klux Klans riding nightly over the country, going from county to county, and in the county towns, spreading terror wherever they go by robbing, whipping, ravishing, and killing our people without provocation, compelling colored people to break the ice and bathe in the chilly waters of the Kentucky River. “The [state] legislature has adjourned. They refused to enact any laws to suppress Ku-Klux disorder. We regard them [the KuKluxers] as now being licensed to continue their dark and bloody deeds under cover of the dark night. They refuse to allow us to testify in the state courts where a white man is concerned. We ﬁnd their deeds are perpetrated only upon colored men and white Republicans. We also ﬁnd that for our services to the government and our race we have become the special object of hatred and persecution at the hands of the Democratic Party. Our people are driven from their homes in great numbers, having no redress only [except] the United States court, which is in many cases unable to reach them.

”


 The Ku Klux Klan, Tennessee, 1868 This night-riding terrorist has even masked the identity of his horse.

 intimidation, fraud, and trickery. Among various underhanded schemes were literacy tests, unfairly administered by whites to the advantage of illiterate whites. In the eyes of white Southerners, the goal of white supremacy fully justiﬁed these dishonorable devices.

 A black leader protested to whites in 1868,

“


 It is extraordinary that a race such as yours, professing gallantry, chivalry, education, and superiority, living in a land where ringing chimes call child and sire to the Gospel of God—that with all these advantages on your side, you can make war upon the poor defenseless black man.

”


The Impeachment Crisis




Impeachment Drama
 The impeachment proceedings against President Andrew Johnson, among the most severe constitutional crises in the Republic’s history, were high political theater, and tickets were in sharp demand.

Johnson Walks the
Impeachment Plank
 Radicals meanwhile had been sharpening their hatchets for President Johnson. Annoyed by the obstruction of the “drunken tailor” in the White House, they falsely accused him of maintaining there a harem of “dissolute women.” Not content with curbing his authority, they decided to remove him altogether by constitutional processes.* As an initial step, Congress in 1867 passed the Tenure of Ofﬁce Act—as usual, over Johnson’s veto. Contrary to precedent, the new law required the president to secure the consent of the Senate before he could remove his appointees once they had been approved by that body. One purpose was to freeze into the cabinet the secretary of war, Edwin M. Stanton, a holdover from the Lincoln administration. Although outwardly loyal to Johnson, he was secretly serving as a spy and informer for the radicals. Johnson provided the radicals with a pretext to begin impeachment proceedings when he abruptly dismissed Stanton early in 1868. The House of Representatives immediately voted 126 to 47 to impeach

 *For impeachment, see Art. I, Sec. II, para. 5; Art. I, Sec. III, paras. 6, 7; Art. II, Sec. IV, in the Appendix.

 Johnson for “high crimes and misdemeanors,” as required by the Constitution, charging him with various violations of the Tenure of Ofﬁce Act. Two additional articles related to Johnson’s verbal assaults on the Congress, involving “disgrace, ridicule, hatred, contempt, and reproach.”

A
Not-Guilty Verdict  for Johnson With evident zeal the radical-led Senate now sat as a court to try Johnson on the dubious impeachment charges. The House conducted the prosecution. The trial aroused intense public interest and, with one thousand tickets printed, proved to be the biggest show of 1868. Johnson kept his dignity and sobriety and maintained a discreet silence. His battery of attorneys argued that the president, convinced that the Tenure of Ofﬁce Act was unconstitutional, had ﬁ red Stanton merely to put a test case before the Supreme Court. (That slow-moving tribunal ﬁ nally ruled indirectly in Johnson’s favor ﬁ fty-eight years later.) House prosecutors, including oily-tongued Benjamin F. Butler and embittered Thaddeus Stevens, had a harder time building a compelling case for impeachment. On May 16, 1868, the day for the ﬁ rst voting in the Senate, the tension was electric, and heavy breathing could be heard in the galleries. By a margin of only one



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 vote, the radicals failed to muster the two-thirds majority for Johnson’s removal. Seven independentminded Republican senators, courageously putting country above party, voted “not guilty.” Several factors shaped the outcome. Fears of creating a destabilizing precedent played a role, as did principled opposition to abusing the constitutional mechanism of checks and balances. Political considerations also ﬁgured conspicuously. As the vice presidency remained vacant under Johnson, his successor would have been radical Republican Benjamin Wade, the president pro tempore of the Senate. Wade was disliked by many members of the business community for his high-tariff, soft-money, pro-labor views and was distrusted by moderate Republicans. Meanwhile, Johnson indicated through his attorney that he would stop obstructing Republican policies in return for remaining in ofﬁce. Diehard radicals were infuriated by their failure to muster a two-thirds majority for Johnson’s removal. “The Country is going to the Devil!” cried the crippled Stevens as he was carried from the hall. But the nation, though violently aroused, accepted the verdict with a good temper that did credit to its political maturity. In a less stable republic, an armed uprising might have erupted against the president. The nation thus narrowly avoided a dangerous precedent that would have gravely weakened one of the three branches of the federal government. Johnson was clearly guilty of bad speeches, bad judgment, and bad temper, but not of “high crimes and misdemeanors.” From the standpoint of the radicals, his greatest crime had been to stand inﬂexibly in their path.

The Purchase of Alaska
 Johnson’s administration, though largely reduced to a ﬁgurehead, achieved its most enduring success in the ﬁeld of foreign relations. The Russians by 1867 were in a mood to sell the vast and chilly expanse of land now known as Alaska. They had already overextended themselves in North America, and they saw that in the likely event of another war with Britain, they probably would lose their defenseless northern province to the sea-dominant British. Alaska, moreover, had been ruthlessly “furred out” and was a growing economic liability. The Russians were therefore quite eager to unload their “frozen asset” on the Americans, and they put out seductive feelers in Washington. They preferred the United States to any

 Map 22.2 Alaska and the Lower Forty-eight States (a size comparison) Interactive Map

 other purchaser, primarily because they wanted to strengthen further the Republic as a barrier against their ancient enemy, Britain. In 1867 Secretary of State William Seward, an ardent expansionist, signed a treaty with Russia that transferred Alaska to the United States for the bargain price of $7.2 million (see Map 22.2). But Seward’s enthusiasm for these frigid wastes was not shared by his ignorant or uninformed countrymen, who jeered at Seward’s Folly, “Seward’s Icebox,” “Frigidia,” and “Walrussia.” The American people, still preoccupied with Reconstruction and other internal vexations, were economy-minded and anti-expansionist. Then why did Congress and the American public sanction the purchase? For one thing Russia, alone among the powers, had been conspicuously friendly to the North during the recent Civil War. Americans did not feel that they could offend their great and good friend, the tsar, by hurling his walrus-covered icebergs back into his face. Besides, the territory was rumored to be teeming with furs, ﬁsh, and gold, and it might yet “pan out” proﬁtably—as it later did with natural resources, including oil and gas. So Congress and the country accepted “Seward’s Polar Bear Garden,” somewhat derisively but nevertheless hopefully.

The Heritage of
Reconstruction
 Many white Southerners regarded Reconstruction as a more grievous wound than the war itself. It left a fes-

 Reconstruction's Legacy



 The Republicans acted from a mixture of idealism and political expediency. They wanted both to protect the freed slaves and to promote the fortunes of the Republican party. In the end their efforts backﬁ red badly. Reconstruction conferred only ﬂeeting beneﬁts on blacks and virtually extinguished the Republican party in the South for nearly one hundred years. Moderate Republicans never fully appreciated the extensive effort necessary to make the freed slaves completely independent citizens, nor the lengths to which Southern whites would go to preserve their system of racial dominance. Had Thaddeus Stevens’s radical program of drastic economic reforms and heftier protection of political rights been enacted, things might well have been different. But deep-seated racism, ingrained American resistance to tampering with property rights, and rigid loyalty to the principle of local self-government, combined with spreading indifference in the North to the plight of blacks, formed too formidable an obstacle. Despite good intentions by Republicans, the Old South was in many ways more resurrected than reconstructed.

 The remarkable ex-slave Frederick Douglass (1817?– 1895) wrote in 1882, Is This a Republican Form of Government? by Thomas Nast, Harper’s Weekly, 1876 The nation’s most prominent political cartoonist expressed his despair at the tragic way that Reconstruction had ended— with few real gains for the former slaves.

 tering scar that would take generations to heal. They resented the upending of their social and racial system, the political empowerment of blacks, and the insult of federal intervention in their local affairs. Yet few rebellions have ended with the victors sitting down to a love feast with the vanquished. Given the explosiveness of the issues that had caused the war, and the bitterness of the ﬁghting, the wonder is that Reconstruction was not far harsher than it was. The fact is that Lincoln, Johnson, and most Republicans had no clear picture at war’s end of what federal policy toward the South should be. Policymakers groped for the right policies, inﬂuenced as much by Southern responses to defeat and emancipation as by any plans of their own to impose a speciﬁc program on the South.

“


 Though slavery was abolished, the wrongs of my people were not ended. Though they were not slaves, they were not yet quite free. No man can be truly free whose liberty is dependent upon the thought, feeling, and action of others, and who has himself no means in his own hands for guarding, protecting, defending, and maintaining that liberty. Yet the Negro after his emancipation was precisely in this state of destitution. . . . He was free from the individual master, but the slave of society. He had neither money, property, nor friends. He was free from the old plantation, but he had nothing but the dusty road under his feet. He was free from the old quarter that once gave him shelter, but a slave to the rains of summer and the frosts of winter. He was, in a word, literally turned loose, naked, hungry, and destitute, to the open sky.

”




Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 CHRONOLOGY

 Lincoln announces “10 percent” Reconstruction plan



 Lincoln vetoes Wade-Davis Bill



 Lincoln assassinated Johnson issues Reconstruction proclamation Congress refuses to seat Southern congressmen Freedmen’s Bureau established Southern states pass Black Codes



 Congress passes Civil Rights Bill over Johnson’s veto Congress passes Fourteenth Amendment Johnson-backed candidates lose congressional election Ex parte Milligan case Ku Klux Klan founded

KEY TERMS
Freedmen’s Bureau (518) “10 percent” Reconstruction plan (519) Wade-Davis Bill (519) Black Codes (521) Paciﬁc Railroad Act (522) Civil Rights Bill (522) Fourteenth Amendment (523) Reconstruction Act (525) Fifteenth Amendment (526) 


Reconstruction Act
 Tenure of Ofﬁce Act United States purchases Alaska from Russia



 Johnson impeached and acquitted Johnson pardons Confederate leaders



 Fifteenth Amendment ratiﬁed

1870–


Force Acts




 Freedmen’s Bureau ended



 Reconstruction ends

PEOPLE TO KNOW
Ex parte Milligan (526) Redeemers (527) Woman’s Loyal League (527) Union League (527) scalawags (528) carpetbaggers (528) Ku Klux Klan (529) Force Acts (530) Tenure of Ofﬁce Act (531) Seward’s Folly (532) 
Oliver O. Howard
Andrew Johnson
Thaddeus Stevens
Hiram Revels


Edwin M. Stanton
Benjamin Wade
William Seward


How Radical Was Reconstruction?


F


 ew topics have triggered as much intellectual warfare as the “dark and bloody ground” of Reconstruction. The period provoked questions—sectional, racial, and constitutional—about which people felt

 deeply and remain deeply divided even today. Scholarly argument goes back conspicuously to a Columbia University historian, William A. Dunning, whose students in the early 1900s published a series of histories

Varying Viewpoints


 of the Reconstruction South. Dunning and his disciples were inﬂuenced by the turn-of-the-century spirit of sectional conciliation as well as by current theories about black racial inferiority. Sympathizing with the white South, they wrote about the Reconstruction period as a kind of national disgrace, foisted upon a prostrate region by vindictive and self-seeking radical Republican politicians. If the South had wronged the North by seceding, the North had wronged the South by reconstructing. A second cycle of scholarship in the 1920s was impelled by a widespread suspicion that the Civil War itself had been a tragic and unnecessary blunder. Attention now shifted to Northern politicians. Scholars like Howard Beale further questioned the motives of the radical Republicans. To Beale and others, the radicals had masked a ruthless desire to exploit Southern labor and resources behind a false front of “concern” for the freed slaves. Moreover, Northern advocacy of black voting rights was merely a calculated attempt to ensure a Republican political presence in the defeated South. The unfortunate Andrew Johnson, in this view, had valiantly tried to uphold constitutional principles in the face of this cynical Northern onslaught. Although ignored by his contemporaries, scholar, black nationalist, and founder of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People W. E. B. Du Bois wrote a sympathetic history of Reconstruction in 1935 that became the basis for historians’ interpretations ever since. Following World War II, Kenneth Stampp and others, inﬂuenced by the modern civil rights movement, built on Du Bois’s argument and claimed that Reconstruction had been a noble though ultimately failed attempt to extend American principles of equity and justice. The radical Republicans and the carpetbaggers were now heroes, whereas Andrew Johnson was castigated for his obsti-



 nate racism. By the early 1970s, this view had become orthodoxy, and it generally holds sway today. Yet some scholars, such as Michael Benedict and Leon Litwack, disillusioned with the inability to achieve full racial justice in the 1960s and 1970s, began once more to scrutinize the motives of Northern politicians immediately after the Civil War. They claimed to discover that Reconstruction had never been very radical and that the Freedmen’s Bureau and other agencies had merely allowed white planters to maintain their dominance over local politics as well as over the local economy. More recently, Eric Foner has powerfully reasserted the argument that Reconstruction was a truly radical and noble attempt to establish an interracial democracy. Drawing upon the work of Du Bois, Foner has emphasized the comparative approach to American Reconstruction. Clearly, Foner has admitted, Reconstruction did not create full equality, but it did allow blacks to form political orga ni zations and churches, to vote, and to establish some mea sure of economic independence. In South Africa, the Caribbean, and other areas once marked by slavery, these opportunities were much harder to come by. Many of the beneﬁts of Reconstruction were erased by whites in the South during the Gilded Age, but in the twentieth century, the constitutional principles and organizations developed during Reconstruction provided the focus and foundation for the modern civil rights movement—which some have called the second Reconstruction. Steven Hahn’s A Nation Under Our Feet: Black Political Struggles in the Rural South from Slavery to the Great Migration (2003) is the latest contribution to the literature on Reconstruction. Hahn emphasizes the assertiveness and ingenuity of African Americans in creating new political opportunities for themselves after emancipation.

To Learn More
Richard N. Current, Those Terrible Carpetbaggers (1988)
Eric Foner, Forever Free: The Story of Emancipation and
Reconstruction (2005)
———, Nothing but Freedom (1983)
Dewey W. Grantham, Life and Death of the Solid South
(1988)
Steven Hahn, A Nation Under Our Feet: Black Political
 Struggles in the Rural South from Slavery to the Great Migration (2003) James M. McPherson, Ordeal by Fire: The Civil War and Reconstruction (1981) Michael Perman, Emancipation and Reconstruction (rev. ed., 2003)

Lawrence Powell, New Masters: Northern Planters During
 the Civil War and Reconstruction (1980) Julie Saville, The Work of Reconstruction (1994) Booker T. Washington, Up from Slavery (1901) Heather Andrea Williams, Self-Taught: African American Education in Slavery and Freedom (2005) A complete, annotated bibliography for this chapter—along with brief descriptions of the People to Know and additional review materials—may be found at www.cengage.com/history/kennedy/ampageant14e

 Sail, sail thy best, ship of Democracy, Of value is thy freight, ’tis not the Present only, The Past is also stored in thee, Thou holdest not the venture of thyself alone, not of the Western continent alone, Earth’s résumé entire floats on thy keel, O ship, is steadied by thy spars, With thee Time voyages in trust, the antecedent nations sink or swim with thee, With all their ancient struggles, martyrs, heroes, epics, wars, thou bear’st the other continents, Theirs, theirs as much as thine, the destination-port triumphant. . . . Walt Whitman Thou Mother with Thy Equal Brood, 1872

T HE
American Pageant 

 This page intentionally left blank

The Ordeal of
Reconstruction





1865–1877
 With malice toward none, with charity for all, with ﬁrmness in the right as God gives us to see the right, let us strive on to ﬁnish the work we are in, to bind up the nation’s wounds, to care for him who shall have borne the battle and for his widow and orphan, to do all which may achieve and cherish a just and lasting peace among ourselves and with all nations.

T


 he battle was done, the buglers silent. Bone-weary and bloodied, the American people, North and South, now faced the staggering challenges of peace. Four questions loomed large. How would the South, physically devastated by war and socially revolutionized by emancipation, be rebuilt? How would liberated blacks fare as free men and women? How would the Southern states be reintegrated into the Union? And who would direct the process of Reconstruction—the Southern states themselves, the president, or Congress?

The Problems of Peace
 Other questions also clamored for answers. What should be done with the captured Confederate ringleaders, all

 of whom were liable to charges of treason? During the war a popular Northern song had been “Hang Jeff Davis to a Sour Apple Tree,” and even innocent children had lisped it. Davis was temporarily clapped into irons during the early days of his two-year imprisonment. But he and his fellow “conspirators” were ﬁnally released, partly because the odds were that no Virginia jury would convict them. All rebel leaders were ﬁ nally pardoned by President Johnson as a sort of Christmas present in 1868. But Congress did not remove all remaining civil disabilities until thirty years later and only posthumously restored Davis’s citizenship more than a century later. Dismal indeed was the picture presented by the war-racked South when the rattle of musketry faded. Not only had an age perished, but a civilization had collapsed, in both its economic and its social structure.

 This icon will direct you to interactive activities and study materials on The American Pageant website: www.cengage.com/history/kennedy/ampageant14e





Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


Charleston, South
Carolina, in Ruins,
 April 1865 Rebel troops evacuating Charleston blew up military supplies to deny them to General William Tecumseh Sherman’s forces. The explosions ignited ﬁres that all but destroyed the city.

 The moonlight-and-magnolia Old South, largely imaginary in any case, had forever gone with the wind. Handsome cities of yesteryear, such as Charleston and Richmond, were rubble-strewn and weed-choked. An Atlantan returned to his once-fair hometown and remarked, “Hell has laid her egg, and right here it hatched.” Economic life had creaked to a halt. Banks and businesses had locked their doors, ruined by runaway inﬂation. Factories were smokeless, silent, dismantled. The transportation system had broken down completely. Before the war ﬁve different railroad lines had converged on Columbia, South Carolina; now the nearest connected track was twenty-nine miles away. Efforts to untwist the rails corkscrewed by Sherman’s soldiers proved bumpily unsatisfactory. Agriculture—the economic lifeblood of the South— was almost hopelessly crippled. Once-white cotton ﬁelds now yielded a lush harvest of nothing but green weeds. The slave-labor system had collapsed, seed was scarce, and livestock had been driven off by plundering Yankees. Pathetic instances were reported of men hitching themselves to plows, while women and children gripped the handles. Not until 1870 did the se-

 ceded states produce as large a cotton crop as that of the fateful year 1860, and much of that yield came from new acreage in the Southwest. The princely planter aristocrats were humbled by the war—at least temporarily. Reduced to proud poverty, they faced charred and gutted mansions, lost investments, and almost worthless land. Their investments of more than $2 billion in slaves, their primary form of wealth, had evaporated with emancipation. Beaten but unbent, many high-spirited white Southerners remained dangerously deﬁant. They cursed the “damnyankees” and spoke of “your government” in Washington instead of “our government.” One Southern bishop refused to pray for President Andrew Johnson, though Johnson proved to be in sore need of divine guidance. Conscious of no crime, these former Confederates continued to believe that their view of secession was correct and that the “lost cause” was still a just war. One popular anti-Union song ran, I’m glad I fought agin her, I only wish we’d won, And I ain’t axed any pardon for anything I’ve done. Such attitudes boded ill for the prospects of painlessly binding up the Republic’s wounds.

From Slavery to Freedom


 Freedmen Deﬁne Freedom Confusion abounded in the still-smoldering South about the precise meaning of “freedom” for blacks. Emancipation took effect haltingly and unevenly in different parts of the conquered Confederacy. As Union armies marched in and out of various localities, many blacks found themselves emancipated and then reenslaved. A North Carolina slave estimated that he had celebrated freedom about twelve times. Blacks from one Texas county ﬂeeing to the free soil of the liberated county next door were attacked by slaveowners as they swam across the river that marked the county line. The next day trees along the riverbank were bent with swinging corpses—a grisly warning to others dreaming of liberty. Other planters resisted emancipation more legalistically, stubbornly protesting that slavery was lawful until state legislatures or the Supreme Court declared otherwise. For many slaves the shackles of bondage were not struck off in a single mighty blow; long-suffering blacks often had to wrench free of their chains link by link. The variety of responses to emancipation, by whites as well as blacks, illustrated the sometimes startling complexity of the master-slave relationship. Loyalty to



 the plantation master prompted some slaves to resist the liberating Union armies, while other slaves’ pentup bitterness burst forth violently on the day of liberation. Many newly emancipated slaves, for example, joined Union troops in pillaging their masters’ possessions. In one instance a group of Virginia slaves laid twenty lashes on the back of their former master—a painful dose of his own favorite medicine. Prodded by the bayonets of Yankee armies of occupation, all masters were eventually forced to recognize their slaves’ permanent freedom. The oncecommanding planter would assemble his former human chattels in front of the porch of the “big house” and announce their liberty. Though some blacks initially responded to news of their emancipation with suspicion and uncertainty, they soon celebrated their newfound freedom. Many took new names in place of the ones given by their masters and demanded that whites formally address them as “Mr.” or “Mrs.” Others abandoned the coarse cottons that had been their only clothing as slaves and sought silks, satins, and other ﬁ nery. Though many whites perceived such behavior as insubordinate, they were forced to recognize the realities of emancipation. “Never before had I a word of impudence from any of our black folk,” wrote one white Southerner, “but they are not ours any longer.”

The Day of Jubilo This French
 illustration of “Emancipated Negroes Celebrating the Emancipation Proclamation” may have been somewhat fanciful, but it captured well the exhilaration that came with freedom.



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


Educating Young Freedmen and Freedwomen,
 1870s Freed slaves in the South regarded schooling as the key to improving their children’s lives and the fulﬁllment of a long-sought right that had been denied blacks in slavery. These well-dressed schoolchildren are lined up outside their rural, one-room schoolhouse alongside their teachers, both black and white.

 Houston H. Holloway, age twenty at the time of his emancipation, recalled his feelings upon hearing of his freedom:

“


 I felt like a bird out of a cage. Amen. Amen. Amen. I could hardly ask to feel any better than I did that day. . . . The week passed off in a blaze of glory.

”


 The reunion of long-lost relatives also inspired joy; one Union ofﬁcer wrote home,

“


 Men are taking their wives and children, families which had been for a long time broken up are united and oh! such happiness. I am glad I am here.

”


 Tens of thousands of emancipated blacks took to the roads, some to test their freedom, others to search for long-lost spouses, parents, and children. Emancipation thus strengthened the black family, and many newly freed men and women formalized “slave marriages” for personal and pragmatic reasons, including the desire to make their children legal heirs. Other blacks left their former masters to work in towns and cities, where existing black communities provided protection and mutual assistance. Whole communities sometimes moved together in search of opportunity. From 1878 to 1880, some twenty-ﬁve thousand blacks from Louisiana, Texas, and Mississippi surged in a mass exodus to Kansas. The westward ﬂood of these “Exodusters” was stemmed only when steamboat captains refused to transport more black migrants across the Mississippi River. The church became the focus of black community life in the years following emancipation. As slaves, blacks had worshiped alongside whites, but now they formed their own churches pastored by their own ministers. Black churches grew robustly. The 150,000member black Baptist Church of 1850 reached 500,000 by 1870, while the African Methodist Episcopal Church

 Letter from a Freedman to His Old Master, 1865 hat was it like to experience the transition from slavery to freedom? Four million Southern blacks faced this exhilarating and formidable prospect with the end of the war. For historians, recovering the African American perspective on emancipation is challenging. Unlike their white masters, freed blacks left few written records. But one former slave captured in a letter to his “Old Master” (whose surname he bore) the heroic determination of many blacks to build new independent and digniﬁed lives for themselves and their families. During the war Jourdon Anderson escaped slavery in Tennessee with his wife and two daughters. After relocating to the relative safety of Ohio, he received a communication from his former owner asking him to return. In his bold reply, reportedly “dictated by the old servant” himself, Anderson expressed his family’s new expectations for life as free people and an uneasiness about his former master’s intentions. He made reference to his “comfortable home,” his daughters’ schooling, the church that he and his wife were free to attend regularly, and the peace of mind that came with knowing that “my girls [would not be] brought to shame by the violence and wickedness of their young masters.” To test the white man’s sincerity, Anderson and his wife asked for the astronomical ﬁgure of $11,680 in back wages from decades as slaves. He closed by reiterating that “the great desire of my life is to give my children an education and have them form virtuous habits.” This rare letter demonstrates that many black correspondents may have been illiterate, but they were hardly inarticulate. And they asserted themselves as parents, workers, and citizens not only from the distance of a former free state like Ohio but also deep within the former slave states of the South. Was the tone of Anderson’s letter (and postscript) serious or tonguein-cheek? What did “freedom” mean for Anderson and other blacks in the months following emancipation? How did the eventual accomplishments of Reconstruction correspond with the initial expectations of people like Anderson and his former owner?

W






Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 quadrupled in size from 100,000 to 400,000 in the ﬁ rst decade after emancipation. These churches formed the bedrock of black community life, and they soon gave rise to other benevolent, fraternal, and mutual aid societies. All these orga ni zations helped blacks protect their newly won freedom. Emancipation also meant education for many blacks. Learning to read and write had been a privilege generally denied to them under slavery. Freedmen wasted no time establishing societies for self-improvement, which undertook to raise funds to purchase land, build schoolhouses, and hire teachers. One member of a North Carolina education society asserted that “a schoolhouse would be the ﬁ rst proof of their independence.” Southern blacks soon found, however, that the demand outstripped the supply of qualiﬁed black teachers. They accepted the aid of Northern white women sent by the American Missionary Association, who volunteered their ser vices as teachers. They also turned to the federal government for help. The freed blacks were going to need all the friends—and power— they could muster in Washington.

 The Freedmen’s Bureau Abolitionists had long preached that slavery was a degrading institution. Now the emancipators were faced with the brutal reality that the freedmen were overwhelmingly unskilled, unlettered, without property or money, and with scant knowledge of how to survive as free people. To cope with this problem throughout the conquered South, Congress created the Freedmen’s Bureau on March 3, 1865. On paper at least, the bureau was intended to be a kind of primitive welfare agency. It was to provide food, clothing, medical care, and education both to freedmen and to white refugees. Heading the bureau was a

 Women from the North enthusiastically embraced the opportunity to go south and teach in Freedmen’s Bureau schools for emancipated blacks. One volunteer explained her motives:

“


 I thought I must do something, not having money at my command, what could I do but give myself to the work. . . . I would go to them, and give them my life if necessary.

”


 warmly sympathetic friend of blacks, Union general Oliver O. Howard, who later founded and served as president of Howard University in Washington, D.C. The bureau achieved its greatest successes in education. It taught an estimated 200,000 blacks how to read. Many former slaves had a passion for learning, partly because they wanted to close the gap between themselves and whites and partly because they longed to read the Word of God. In one elementary class in North Carolina sat four generations of the same family, ranging from a six-year-old child to a seventy-ﬁve-yearold grandmother. But in other areas, the bureau’s accomplishments were meager—or even mischievous. Although the bureau was authorized to settle former slaves on forty-acre tracts conﬁscated from the Confederates, little land actually made it into blacks’ hands. Instead local administrators often collaborated with planters in expelling blacks from towns and cajoling them into signing labor contracts to work for their former masters. Still, the white South resented the bureau as a meddlesome federal interloper that threatened to upset white racial dominance. President Andrew Johnson, who shared the white supremacist views of most white Southerners, repeatedly tried to kill it, and it expired in 1872.

Johnson: The Tailor President
 Few presidents have ever been faced with a more perplexing sea of troubles than that confronting Andrew Johnson. What manner of man was this medium-built, dark-eyed, black-haired Tennessean, now chief executive by virtue of the bullet that killed Lincoln? No citizen, not even Lincoln, has ever reached the White House from humbler beginnings. Born to impoverished parents in North Carolina and orphaned early, Johnson never attended school but was apprenticed to a tailor at age ten. Ambitious to get ahead, he taught himself to read, and later his wife taught him to write and do simple arithmetic. Like many another self-made man, he was inclined to overpraise his maker. Johnson early became active in politics in Tennessee, where he had moved when seventeen years old. He shone as an impassioned champion of poor whites against the planter aristocrats, although he himself ultimately owned a few slaves. He excelled as a two-ﬁsted stump speaker before angry and heckling crowds, who on occasion greeted his political oratory with cocked pistols, not just cocked ears. Elected to Congress, he attracted much favorable attention in the

 Johnson's Plans for the South



Crushed by the Constitution
 President Andrew Johnson revered the U.S. Constitution but eventually felt its awesome weight in his impeachment trial.

 North (but not the South) when he refused to secede with his own state. After Tennessee was partially “redeemed” by Union armies, he was appointed war governor and served courageously in an at mosphere of danger. Political exigency next thrust Johnson into the vice presidency. Lincoln’s Union party in 1864 needed to attract support from the War Democrats and other proSouthern elements, and Johnson, a Democrat, seemed to be the ideal man. Unfortunately, he appeared at the vice-presidential inaugural ceremonies the following March in a scandalous condition. He had recently been afﬂ icted with typhoid fever, and although not known as a heavy drinker, he was urged by his friends to take a stiff bracer of whiskey. This he did—with unfortunate results. “Old Andy” Johnson was no doubt a man of parts— unpolished parts. He was intelligent, able, forceful, and gifted with homespun honesty. Steadfastly devoted to duty and to the people, he was a dogmatic champion of states’ rights and the Constitution. He would often present a copy of the document to visitors, and he was buried with one as a pillow. Yet the man who had raised himself from the tailor’s bench to the president’s chair was a misﬁt. A Southerner who did not understand the North, a Tennessean who had earned the distrust of the South, a Democrat who had never been accepted by the Republicans, a president who had never been elected to the

 ofﬁce, he was not at home in a Republican White House. Hotheaded, contentious, and stubborn, he was the wrong man in the wrong place at the wrong time. A Reconstruction policy devised by angels might well have failed in his tactless hands.

Presidential Reconstruction
 Even before the shooting war had ended, the political war over Reconstruction had begun. Abraham Lincoln believed that the Southern states had never legally withdrawn from the Union. Their formal restoration to the Union would therefore be relatively simple. Accordingly, Lincoln in 1863 proclaimed his “10 percent” Reconstruction plan. It decreed that a state could be reintegrated into the Union when 10 percent of its voters in the presidential election of 1860 had taken an oath of allegiance to the United States and pledged to abide by emancipation. The next step would be formal erection of a state government. Lincoln would then recognize the puriﬁed regime. Lincoln’s proclamation provoked a sharp reaction in Congress, where Republicans feared the restoration of the planter aristocracy to power and the possible reenslavement of blacks. Republicans therefore rammed through Congress in 1864 the Wade-Davis Bill. The bill required that 50 percent of a state’s voters take the oath of allegiance and demanded stronger safeguards for



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 emancipation than Lincoln’s as the price of readmission to the Union. Lincoln “pocket-vetoed” this bill by refusing to sign it after Congress had adjourned. Republicans were outraged. They refused to seat delegates from Louisiana after that state had reorga nized its government in accordance with Lincoln’s 10 percent plan in 1864. The controversy surrounding the Wade-Davis Bill had revealed deep differences between the president and Congress. Unlike Lincoln, many in Congress insisted that the seceders had indeed left the Union—had “committed suicide” as republican states—and had therefore forfeited all their rights. They could be readmitted only as “conquered provinces” on such conditions as Congress should decree. This episode further revealed differences among Republicans. Two factions were emerging. The majority moderate group tended to agree with Lincoln that the seceded states should be restored to the Union as simply and swiftly as reasonable—though on Congress’s terms, not the president’s. The minority radical group believed that the South should atone more painfully for its sins. Before the South should be restored, the radicals wanted its social structure uprooted, the haughty planters punished, and the newly emancipated blacks protected by federal power. Some of the radicals were secretly pleased when the assassin’s bullet felled Lincoln, for the martyred president had shown tenderness toward the South. Spiteful “Andy” Johnson, who shared their hatred for the planter aristocrats, would presumably also share their desire to reconstruct the South with a rod of iron. Johnson soon disillusioned them. He agreed with Lincoln that the seceded states had never legally been outside the Union. Thus he quickly recognized several of Lincoln’s 10 percent governments, and on May 29, 1865, he issued his own Reconstruction proclamation (see Table 22.1). It disfranchised certain leading Con-

Before President Andrew Johnson (1808–1875)
 softened his Southern policy, his views were radical. Speaking on April 21, 1865, he declared,

“


 It is not promulgating anything that I have not heretofore said to say that traitors must be made odious, that treason must be made odious, that traitors must be punished and impoverished. They must not only be punished, but their social power must be destroyed. If not, they will still maintain an ascendancy, and may again become numerous and powerful; for, in the words of a former Senator of the United States, ‘When traitors become numerous enough, treason becomes respectable.’

”


 federates, including those with taxable property worth more than $20,000, though they might petition him for personal pardons. It called for special state conventions, which were required to repeal the ordinances of secession, repudiate all Confederate debts, and ratify the slave-freeing Thirteenth Amendment. States that complied with these conditions, Johnson declared, would be swiftly readmitted to the Union. Johnson, savoring his dominance over the hightoned aristocrats who now begged his favor, granted pardons in abundance. Bolstered by the political resurrection of the planter elite, the recently rebellious states moved rapidly in the second half of 1865 to organize governments. But as the pattern of the new governments became clear, Republicans of all stripes grew furious.

Table 22.1 Principal Reconstruction Proposals and Plans
Year


Proposal or Plan


1864–1865
1865–1866
1866–1867
1867–1877


 Lincoln’s 10 percent proposal Johnson’s version of Lincoln’s proposal Congressional plan: 10 percent plan with Fourteenth Amendment Congressional plan of military Reconstruction: Fourteenth Amendment plus black suffrage, later established nationwide by Fifteenth Amendment

The Black Codes


The Baleful Black Codes
 Among the ﬁ rst acts of the new Southern regimes sanctioned by Johnson was the passage of the iron-toothed Black Codes. These laws were designed to regulate the affairs of the emancipated blacks, much as the slave statutes had done in pre–Civil War days. Mississippi passed the ﬁ rst such law in November 1865, and other Southern states soon followed suit. The Black Codes varied in severity from state to state (Mississippi’s was the harshest and Georgia’s the most lenient), but they had much in common. The Black Codes aimed, ﬁ rst of all, to ensure a stable and subservient labor force. The crushed Cotton Kingdom could not rise from its weeds until the ﬁelds were once again put under hoe and plow—and many whites wanted to make sure that they retained the tight control they had exercised over black ﬁeld hands and plow drivers in the days of slavery. Dire penalties were therefore imposed by the codes on blacks who “jumped” their labor contracts, which usually committed them to work for the same employer for one year, and generally at pittance wages. Violators could be made to forfeit back wages or could be forcibly dragged back to work by a paid “Negro-catcher.” In Mississippi the captured freedmen could be ﬁ ned and then hired out to pay their ﬁ nes—an arrangement that closely resembled slavery itself.



 Early in 1866 one congressman quoted a Georgian:

“


 The blacks eat, sleep, move, live, only by the tolerance of the whites, who hate them. The blacks own absolutely nothing but their bodies; their former masters own everything, and will sell them nothing. If a black man draws even a bucket of water from a well, he must ﬁrst get the permission of a white man, his enemy. . . . If he asks for work to earn his living, he must ask it of a white man; and the whites are determined to give him no work, except on such terms as will make him a serf and impair his liberty.

”


 The codes also sought to restore as nearly as possible the pre-emancipation system of race relations. Freedom was legally recognized, as were some other privileges, such as the right to marry. But all the codes forbade a black to serve on a jury; some even barred blacks from renting or leasing land. A black could be punished for “idleness” by being sentenced to work on a chain gang. Nowhere were blacks allowed to vote. These oppressive laws mocked the ideal of freedom, so recently purchased by buckets of blood. The

Sharecroppers Picking Cotton
 Although many freed slaves found themselves picking cotton on their former masters’ plantations, they took comfort that they were at least paid wages and could work as a family unit. In time, however, they became ensnared in the web of debt that their planter bosses spun to keep a free labor force tightly bound to them.



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 Black Codes imposed terrible burdens on the unfettered blacks, struggling against mistreatment and poverty to make their way as free people. The worst features of the Black Codes would eventually be repealed, but their revocation could not by itself lift the liberated blacks into economic independence. Lacking capital, and with little to offer but their labor, thousands of impoverished former slaves slipped into the status of sharecropper farmers, as did many landless whites. Luckless sharecroppers gradually sank into a morass of virtual peonage and remained there for generations. Formerly slaves to masters, countless blacks as well as poorer whites in effect became slaves to the soil and to their creditors. Yet the dethroned planter aristocracy resented even this pitiful concession to freedom. Sharecropping was the “wrong policy,” said one planter. “It makes the laborer too independent; he becomes a partner, and has a right to be consulted.” The Black Codes made an ugly impression in the North. If the former slaves were being re-enslaved, people asked one another, had not the Boys in Blue spilled their blood in vain? Had the North really won the war?

Congressional Reconstruction
 These questions grew more insistent when the congressional delegations from the newly reconstituted Southern states presented themselves in the Capitol in December 1865. To the shock and disgust of the Republicans, many former Confederate leaders were on hand to claim their seats. The appearance of these ex-rebels was a natural but costly blunder. Voters of the South, seeking able representatives, had turned instinctively to their experienced statesmen. But most of the Southern leaders were tainted by active association with the “lost cause.” Among them were four former Confederate generals, ﬁve colonels, and various members of the Richmond cabinet and Congress. Worst of all, there was the shrimpy but brainy Alexander Stephens, ex–vice president of the Confederacy, still under indictment for treason. The presence of these “whitewashed rebels” infuriated the Republicans in Congress. The war had been fought to restore the Union, but not on these kinds of terms. The Republicans were in no hurry to embrace their former enemies—virtually all of them Democrats—in the chambers of the Capitol. While the South

 had been “out” from 1861 to 1865, the Republicans in Congress had enjoyed a relatively free hand. They had passed much legislation that favored the North, such as the Morrill Tariff, the Paciﬁc Railroad Act, and the Homestead Act. Now many Republicans balked at giving up this political advantage. On the ﬁ rst day of the congressional session, December 4, 1865, they banged shut the door in the face of the newly elected Southern delegations. Looking to the future, the Republicans were alarmed to realize that a restored South would be stronger than ever in national politics. Before the war a black slave had counted as three-ﬁ fths of a person in apportioning congressional representation. Now the slave was ﬁve-ﬁ fths of a person. Eleven Southern states had seceded and been subdued by force of arms. But now, owing to full counting of free blacks, the rebel states were entitled to twelve more votes in Congress, and twelve more presidential electoral votes, than they had previously enjoyed. Again, angry voices in the North raised the cry, Who won the war? Republicans had good reason to fear that ultimately they might be elbowed aside. Southerners might join hands with Democrats in the North and win control of Congress or maybe even the White House. If this happened, they could perpetuate the Black Codes, virtually re-enslaving blacks. They could dismantle the economic program of the Republican party by lowering tariffs, rerouting the transcontinental railroad, repealing the free-farm Homestead Act, and possibly even repudiating the national debt. President Johnson thus deeply disturbed the congressional Republicans when he announced on December 6, 1865, that the recently rebellious states had satisﬁed his conditions and that in his view the Union was now restored.

 Johnson Clashes with Congress A clash between president and Congress was now inevitable. It exploded into the open in February 1866, when the president vetoed a bill (later repassed) extending the life of the controversial Freedmen’s Bureau. Aroused, the Republicans swiftly struck back. In March 1866 they passed the Civil Rights Bill, which conferred on blacks the privilege of American citizenship and struck at the Black Codes. President Johnson resolutely vetoed this forward-looking mea sure on constitutional grounds, but in April congressmen steamrollered it over his veto—something they repeat-

Johnson Versus Congressional Republicans


 edly did henceforth. The hapless president, dubbed “Sir Veto” and “Andy Veto,” had his presidential wings clipped, as Congress increasingly assumed the dominant role in running the government. One critic called Johnson “the dead dog of the White House.” The Republicans now undertook to rivet the principles of the Civil Rights Bill into the Constitution as the Fourteenth Amendment. They feared that the Southerners might one day win control of Congress and repeal the hated law. The proposed amendment, approved by Congress and sent to the states in June 1866 and ratiﬁed in 1868, was sweeping. It (1) conferred civil rights, including citizenship but excluding the fran-



 chise, on the freedmen; (2) reduced proportionately the representation of a state in Congress and in the Electoral College if it denied blacks the ballot; (3) disqualiﬁed from federal and state ofﬁce former Confederates who as federal ofﬁceholders had once sworn “to support the Constitution of the United States”; and (4) guaranteed the federal debt, while repudiating all Confederate debts. (See the text of the Fourteenth Amendment in the Appendix.) The radical faction was disappointed that the Fourteenth Amendment did not grant the right to vote, but all Republicans were agreed that no state should be welcomed back into the Union fold without ﬁ rst ratifying the Fourteenth Amendment. Yet President Johnson advised the Southern states to reject it, and all of the “sinful eleven,” except Tennessee, deﬁantly spurned the amendment. Their spirit was reﬂected in a Southern song: And I don’t want no pardon for what I was or am, I won’t be reconstructed and I don’t give a damn.

Swinging ’Round the
 Circle with Johnson

 An Inﬂexible President, 1866 This Republican cartoon shows Johnson knocking blacks out of the Freedmen’s Bureau by his veto.

 As 1866 lengthened, the battle grew between the Congress and the president. The root of the controversy was Johnson’s “10 percent” governments that had passed the most stringent Black Codes. Congress had tried to temper the worst features of the codes by extending the life of the embattled Freedmen’s Bureau and passing the Civil Rights Bill. Both mea sures Johnson had vetoed. Now the issue was whether Reconstruction was to be carried on with or without the Fourteenth Amendment. The Republicans would settle for nothing less. The crucial congressional elections of 1866—more crucial than some presidential elections—were fast approaching. Johnson was naturally eager to escape from the clutch of Congress by securing a majority favorable to his soft-on-the-South policy. Invited to dedicate a Chicago monument to Stephen A. Douglas, he undertook to speak at various cities en route in support of his views. Johnson’s famous “swing ’round the circle,” beginning in the late summer of 1866, was a seriocomedy of errors. The president delivered a series of “give ’em hell” speeches, in which he accused the radicals in Congress of having planned large-scale antiblack riots and murder in the South. As he spoke, hecklers hurled insults at



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 him. Reverting to his stump-speaking days in Tennessee, he shouted back angry retorts, amid cries of “You be damned” and “Don’t get mad, Andy.” The dignity of his high ofﬁce sank to a new low, as the old charges of drunkenness were revived. As a vote-getter, Johnson was highly successful— for the opposition. His inept speechmaking heightened the cry “Stand by Congress” against the “Tailor of the Potomac.” When the ballots were counted, the Republicans had rolled up more than a two-thirds majority in both houses of Congress.

Republican Principles
 and Programs The Republicans now had a veto-proof Congress and virtually unlimited control of Reconstruction policy. But moderates and radicals still disagreed over the best course to pursue in the South.

Republicans Campaigning in
Baton Rouge, Louisiana, 1868
 The soldiers’ caps and regimental ﬂags demonstrate the continuing federal military presence in the Reconstruction South. Radical Republican congressman Thaddeus Stevens said that Reconstruction must “revolutionize Southern institutions, habits, and manners. . . . The foundation of their institutions . . . must be broken up and relaid, or all our blood and treasure have been spent in vain.”

 The radicals in the Senate were led by the courtly and principled idealist Charles Sumner, long since recovered from his prewar caning on the Senate ﬂoor, who tirelessly labored not only for black freedom but for racial equality. In the House the most powerful radical was Thaddeus Stevens, crusty and vindictive congressman from Pennsylvania. Seventy-four years old in 1866, he was a curious ﬁgure, with a protruding lower lip, a heavy black wig covering his bald head, and a deformed foot. An unswerving friend of blacks, he had defended runaway slaves in court without fee and, before dying, insisted on burial in a black cemetery. His affectionate devotion to blacks was matched by his vitriolic hatred of rebellious white Southerners. A masterly parliamentarian with a razor-sharp mind and withering wit, Stevens was a leading ﬁgure on the Joint (House-Senate) Committee on Reconstruction. Still opposed to rapid restoration of the Southern states, the radicals wanted to keep them out as long as possible and apply federal power to bring about a dras-

Military Reconstruction


 though the moderates, as the majority faction, had the upper hand. And one thing both groups had come to agree on by 1867 was the necessity to enfranchise black voters, even if it took federal troops to do it.

Representative Thaddeus Stevens (1792–1868), in
 a congressional speech on January 3, 1867, urged the ballot for blacks out of concern for them and out of bitterness against Southern whites:

“


 I am for Negro suffrage in every rebel state. If it be just, it should not be denied; if it be necessary, it should be adopted; if it be a punishment to traitors, they deserve it.

Reconstruction by the Sword


”


 tic social and economic transformation in the South. But moderate Republicans, more attuned to the timehonored principles of states’ rights and self-government, recoiled from the full implications of the radical program. They preferred policies that restrained the states from abridging citizens’ rights, rather than policies that directly involved the federal government in individual lives. The actual policies adopted by Congress showed the inﬂuence of both these schools of thought,

 Against a backdrop of vicious and bloody race riots that had erupted in several Southern cities, Congress passed the Reconstruction Act on March 2, 1867 (see Map 22.1). Supplemented by later mea sures, this drastic legislation divided the South into ﬁve military districts, each commanded by a Union general and policed by blue-clad soldiers, about twenty thousand all told. The act also temporarily disfranchised tens of thousands of former Confederates. Congress additionally laid down stringent conditions for the readmission of the seceded states. The wayward states were required to ratify the Fourteenth Amendment, giving the former slaves their rights as citizens. The bitterest pill of all to white Southerners

 Map 22.1 Military Reconstruction, 1867 (ﬁve districts and commanding generals) For many white Southerners, military Reconstruction amounted to turning the knife in the wound of defeat. An often-repeated story of later years had a Southerner remark, “I was sixteen years old before I discovered that damnyankee was two words.” Boundaries of the five Military Districts

 VA.

Interactive Map




MILITARY DISTRICT 1

 Tennessee escaped military regime.

 1870 Date refers to year of readmission to the Union

General Schofield


N.C.


 TENNESSEE

 ARKANSAS

MILITARY DISTRICT 4
General Ord 
 TEXAS

 MISS.

MILITARY DISTRICT 5
General Sheridan 


 ALABAMA

MILITARY DISTRICT 2

General Sickles


 GEORGIA



S.C.


MILITARY DISTRICT 3
General Pope 
 LOUISIANA

 FLORIDA



Years “Redeemer”
 governments established Established 1869 –1871 Established 1873 –1874 Established 1876 –1877

 Presidential electoral vote by party Independent Democratic Republican Democratic



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 was the stipulation that they guarantee in their state constitutions full suffrage for their former adult male slaves. Yet the act, reﬂecting moderate sentiment, stopped short of giving the freedmen land or education at federal expense. The overriding purpose of the moderates was to create an electorate in Southern states that would vote those states back into the Union on acceptable terms and thus free the federal government from direct responsibility for the protection of black rights. As later events would demonstrate, this approach proved woefully inadequate to the cause of justice for blacks. The radical Republicans were still worried. The danger loomed that once the unrepentant states were readmitted, they would amend their constitutions so as to withdraw the ballot from blacks. The only ironclad safeguard was to incorporate black suffrage in the federal Constitution. This goal was ﬁ nally achieved by the Fifteenth Amendment, passed by Congress in 1869 and ratiﬁed by the required number of states in 1870 (see the Appendix). Military Reconstruction of the South not only usurped certain functions of the president as commander in chief but set up a martial regime of dubious legality. The Supreme Court had already ruled, in the

 At a constitutional convention in Alabama, freed people afﬁrmed their rights in the following declaration:

“


 We claim exactly the same rights, privileges and immunities as are enjoyed by white men—we ask nothing more and will be content with nothing less. . . . The law no longer knows white nor black, but simply men, and consequently we are entitled to ride in public conveyances, hold ofﬁce, sit on juries and do everything else which we have in the past been prevented from doing solely on the ground of color.

”


 case Ex parte Milligan (1866), that military tribunals could not try civilians, even during wartime, in areas where the civil courts were open. Peacetime military rule seemed starkly contrary to the spirit of the Constitution. But the circumstances were extraordinary in the Republic’s history, and for the time being the Supreme Court avoided offending the Republican Congress.

Table 22.2 Southern Reconstruction by State


State


Readmitted to
Representation
 in Congress

Home Rule (Democratic
 or “Redeemer” Regime) Reestablished

Tennessee


July 24, 1866


Arkansas
North Carolina
Alabama
Florida


June 22, 1868
June 25, 1868
June 25, 1868
June 25, 1868




Louisiana
South Carolina
Virginia
Mississippi
Texas
Georgia


June 25, 1868
June 25, 1868
January 26, 1870
February 23, 1870
March 30, 1870
[June 25, 1868] July 15, 1870




Comments
 Ratiﬁed Fourteenth Amendment in 1866 and hence avoided military Reconstruction*

 Federal troops restationed in 1877, as result of Hayes-Tilden electoral bargain Same as Florida Same as Florida

 Readmitted June 25, 1868, but returned to military control after expulsion of blacks from legislature

 *For many years Tennessee was the only state of the secession to observe Lincoln’s birthday as a legal holiday. Many states in the South still observe the birthdays of Jefferson Davis and Robert E. Lee.

Amending the Constitution


 Prodded into line by federal bayonets, the Southern states got on with the task of constitution making. By 1870 all of them had reorga nized their governments and had been accorded full rights (see Table 22.2). The hated “bluebellies” remained until the new Republican regimes—usually called “radical” regimes—appeared to be ﬁ rmly entrenched. Yet when the federal troops ﬁnally left a state, its government swiftly passed back into the hands of white Redeemers, or “Home Rule” regimes, which were inevitably Democratic. Finally, in 1877, the last federal muskets were removed from state politics, and the “solid” Democratic South congealed.

No Women Voters
 The passage of the three Reconstruction-era Amendments—the Thirteenth, Fourteenth, and Fifteenth— delighted former abolitionists but deeply disappointed advocates of women’s rights. Women had played a prominent part in the prewar abolitionist movement and had often pointed out that both women and blacks lacked basic civil rights, especially the crucial right to vote. The struggle for black freedom and the crusade for women’s rights, therefore, were one and the same in the eyes of many women. Yet during the war, feminist leaders such as Elizabeth Cady Stanton and Susan B. Anthony had temporarily suspended their own demands and worked wholeheartedly for the cause of black emancipation. The Woman’s Loyal League had gathered nearly 400,000 signatures on petitions asking Congress to pass a constitutional amendment prohibiting slavery. Now, with the war ended and the Thirteenth Amendment passed, feminist leaders believed that their time had come. They reeled with shock, however,

 The prominent suffragist and abolitionist Susan B. Anthony (1820–1906) was outraged over the proposed exclusion of women from the Fourteenth Amendment. In a conversation with her former male allies Wendell Phillips and Theodore Tilton, she reportedly held out her arm and declared,

“


 Look at this, all of you. And hear me swear that I will cut off this right arm of mine before I will ever work for or demand the ballot for the negro and not the woman.

”




 when the wording of the Fourteenth Amendment, which deﬁ ned equal national citizenship, for the ﬁ rst time inserted the word male into the Constitution in referring to a citizen’s right to vote. Both Stanton and Anthony campaigned actively against the Fourteenth Amendment despite the pleas of Frederick Douglass, who had long supported woman suffrage but believed that this was “the Negro’s hour.” When the Fifteenth Amendment proposed to prohibit denial of the vote on the basis of “race, color, or previous condition of servitude,” Stanton and Anthony wanted the word sex added to the list. They lost this battle, too. Fifty years would pass before the Constitution granted women the right to vote.

The Realities of Radical
Reconstruction in the South
 Blacks now had freedom, of a sort. Their friends in Congress had only haltingly and somewhat belatedly secured the franchise for them. Both Presidents Lincoln and Johnson had proposed to give the ballot gradually to selected blacks who qualiﬁed for it through education, property ownership, or military ser vice. Moderate Republicans and even many radicals at ﬁ rst hesitated to bestow suffrage on the freedmen. The Fourteenth Amendment, in many ways the heart of the Republican program for Reconstruction, had fallen short of guaranteeing the right to vote. (It envisioned for blacks the same status as that of women—citizenship without voting rights.) But by 1867 hesitation had given way to a hard determination to enfranchise the former slaves wholesale and immediately, while thousands of white Southerners were being denied the vote. By glaring contrast, most of the Northern states, before ratiﬁcation of the Fifteenth Amendment in 1870, withheld the ballot from their tiny black minorities. White Southerners naturally concluded that the Republicans were hypocritical in insisting that blacks in the South be allowed to vote. Having gained their right to suffrage, Southern black men seized the initiative and began to organize politically. Their primary vehicle became the Union League, originally a pro-Union orga ni zation based in the North. Assisted by Northern blacks, freedmen turned the League into a network of political clubs that educated members in their civic duties and campaigned for Republican candidates. The league’s mission soon expanded to include building black churches and schools, representing black grievances before local



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


Freedmen Voting, Richmond,
 Virginia, 1871 The exercise of democratic rights by former slaves constituted a political and social revolution in the South and was bitterly resented by whites.

 employers and government, and recruiting militias to protect black communities from white retaliation. Though African American women did not obtain the right to vote, they too assumed new political roles. Black women faithfully attended the parades and rallies common in black communities during the early years of Reconstruction and helped assemble mass meetings in the newly constructed black churches. They even showed up at the constitutional conventions held throughout the South in 1867, monitoring the proceedings and participating in informal votes outside the convention halls. But black men elected as delegates to the state constitutional conventions held the greater political authority. They formed the backbone of the black political community. At the conventions, they sat down with whites to hammer out new state constitutions, which most importantly provided for universal male suffrage. Though the subsequent elections produced no black governors or majorities in state senates, black political participation expanded exponentially during Reconstruction. Between 1868 and 1876, fourteen black congressmen and two black senators, Hiram Revels and Blanche K. Bruce, both of Mississippi, served in Washington, D.C. Blacks also served in state governments as

 lieutenant governors and representatives, and in local governments as mayors, magistrates, sheriffs, and justices of the peace. The sight of former slaves holding ofﬁce deeply offended their onetime masters, who lashed out with particular fury at the freedmen’s white allies, labeling them scalawags and carpetbaggers. The so-called scalawags were Southerners, often former Unionists and Whigs. The former Confederates accused them, often with wild exaggeration, of plundering the treasuries of the Southern states through their political inﬂuence in the radical governments. The carpetbaggers, on the other hand, were supposedly sleazy Northerners who had packed all their worldly goods into a carpetbag suitcase at war’s end and had come South to seek personal power and proﬁt. In fact, most were former Union soldiers and Northern businessmen and professionals who wanted to play a role in modernizing the “New South.” How well did the radical regimes rule? The radical legislatures passed much desirable legislation and introduced many badly needed reforms. For the ﬁ rst time in Southern history, steps were taken toward establishing adequate public schools. Tax systems were streamlined; public works were launched; and property rights

Radical Reconstruction




Black Reconstruction
 A composite portrait of the ﬁrst black senators and representatives in the Forty-ﬁrst and Forty-second Congresses. Senator Hiram Revels, on the left, was elected in 1870 to the seat that had been occupied by Jefferson Davis when the South seceded.

 were guaranteed to women. Many welcome reforms were retained by the all-white “Redeemer” governments that later returned to power. Despite these achievements, graft ran rampant in many “radical” governments. This was especially true in South Carolina and Louisiana, where conscienceless promoters and other pocket-padders used politically inexperienced blacks as pawns. The worst “black-andwhite” legislatures purchased, as “legislative supplies,” such “stationery” as hams, perfumes, suspenders, bonnets, corsets, champagne, and a cofﬁ n. One “thrifty” carpetbag governor in a single year “saved” $100,000 from a salary of $8,000. Yet this sort of corruption was by no means conﬁ ned to the South in these postwar years. The crimes of the Reconstruction governments were no more outrageous than the scams and felonies being perpetrated in the North at the same time, especially in Boss Tweed’s New York.

The Ku Klux Klan
 Deeply embittered, some Southern whites resorted to savage mea sures against “radical” rule. Many whites resented the success and ability of black legislators as

 much as they resented alleged “corruption.” A number of secret orga ni zations mushroomed forth, the most notorious of which was the “Invisible Empire of the South,” or Ku Klux Klan, founded in Tennessee in 1866. Besheeted nightriders, their horses’ hooves mufﬂed, would approach the cabin of an “upstart” black and hammer on the door. In ghoulish tones one thirsty horseman would demand a bucket of water. Then, under pretense of drinking, he would pour it into a rubber attachment concealed beneath his mask and gown, smack his lips, and declare that this was the ﬁ rst water he had tasted since he was killed at the Battle of Shiloh. If fright did not produce the desired effect, force was employed. Such tomfoolery and terror proved partially effective. Many ex-bondsmen and white “carpetbaggers,” quick to take a hint, shunned the polls. Those stubborn souls who persisted in their “upstart” ways were ﬂogged, mutilated, or even murdered. In one Louisiana parish in 1868, whites in two days killed or wounded two hundred victims; a pile of twenty-ﬁve bodies was found half-buried in the woods. By such atrocious practices were blacks “kept in their place”—that is, down. The Klan became a refuge for numerous bandits and cutthroats. Any scoundrel could don a sheet.



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 Congress, outraged by this night-riding lawlessness, passed the harsh Force Acts of 1870 and 1871. Federal troops were able to stamp out much of the “lash law,” but by this time the Invisible Empire had already done its work of intimidation. Many of the outlawed groups continued their tactics in the guise of “dancing clubs,” “missionary societies,” and “riﬂe clubs.” White resistance undermined attempts to empower blacks politically. The white South, for many decades, openly ﬂouted the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments. Wholesale disfranchisement of blacks, starting conspicuously about 1890, was achieved by

 The following excerpt is part of a heartrending appeal to Congress in 1871 by a group of Kentucky blacks:

“


 We believe you are not familiar with the description of the Ku Klux Klans riding nightly over the country, going from county to county, and in the county towns, spreading terror wherever they go by robbing, whipping, ravishing, and killing our people without provocation, compelling colored people to break the ice and bathe in the chilly waters of the Kentucky River. “The [state] legislature has adjourned. They refused to enact any laws to suppress Ku-Klux disorder. We regard them [the KuKluxers] as now being licensed to continue their dark and bloody deeds under cover of the dark night. They refuse to allow us to testify in the state courts where a white man is concerned. We ﬁnd their deeds are perpetrated only upon colored men and white Republicans. We also ﬁnd that for our services to the government and our race we have become the special object of hatred and persecution at the hands of the Democratic Party. Our people are driven from their homes in great numbers, having no redress only [except] the United States court, which is in many cases unable to reach them.

”


 The Ku Klux Klan, Tennessee, 1868 This night-riding terrorist has even masked the identity of his horse.

 intimidation, fraud, and trickery. Among various underhanded schemes were literacy tests, unfairly administered by whites to the advantage of illiterate whites. In the eyes of white Southerners, the goal of white supremacy fully justiﬁed these dishonorable devices.

 A black leader protested to whites in 1868,

“


 It is extraordinary that a race such as yours, professing gallantry, chivalry, education, and superiority, living in a land where ringing chimes call child and sire to the Gospel of God—that with all these advantages on your side, you can make war upon the poor defenseless black man.

”


The Impeachment Crisis




Impeachment Drama
 The impeachment proceedings against President Andrew Johnson, among the most severe constitutional crises in the Republic’s history, were high political theater, and tickets were in sharp demand.

Johnson Walks the
Impeachment Plank
 Radicals meanwhile had been sharpening their hatchets for President Johnson. Annoyed by the obstruction of the “drunken tailor” in the White House, they falsely accused him of maintaining there a harem of “dissolute women.” Not content with curbing his authority, they decided to remove him altogether by constitutional processes.* As an initial step, Congress in 1867 passed the Tenure of Ofﬁce Act—as usual, over Johnson’s veto. Contrary to precedent, the new law required the president to secure the consent of the Senate before he could remove his appointees once they had been approved by that body. One purpose was to freeze into the cabinet the secretary of war, Edwin M. Stanton, a holdover from the Lincoln administration. Although outwardly loyal to Johnson, he was secretly serving as a spy and informer for the radicals. Johnson provided the radicals with a pretext to begin impeachment proceedings when he abruptly dismissed Stanton early in 1868. The House of Representatives immediately voted 126 to 47 to impeach

 *For impeachment, see Art. I, Sec. II, para. 5; Art. I, Sec. III, paras. 6, 7; Art. II, Sec. IV, in the Appendix.

 Johnson for “high crimes and misdemeanors,” as required by the Constitution, charging him with various violations of the Tenure of Ofﬁce Act. Two additional articles related to Johnson’s verbal assaults on the Congress, involving “disgrace, ridicule, hatred, contempt, and reproach.”

A
Not-Guilty Verdict  for Johnson With evident zeal the radical-led Senate now sat as a court to try Johnson on the dubious impeachment charges. The House conducted the prosecution. The trial aroused intense public interest and, with one thousand tickets printed, proved to be the biggest show of 1868. Johnson kept his dignity and sobriety and maintained a discreet silence. His battery of attorneys argued that the president, convinced that the Tenure of Ofﬁce Act was unconstitutional, had ﬁ red Stanton merely to put a test case before the Supreme Court. (That slow-moving tribunal ﬁ nally ruled indirectly in Johnson’s favor ﬁ fty-eight years later.) House prosecutors, including oily-tongued Benjamin F. Butler and embittered Thaddeus Stevens, had a harder time building a compelling case for impeachment. On May 16, 1868, the day for the ﬁ rst voting in the Senate, the tension was electric, and heavy breathing could be heard in the galleries. By a margin of only one



Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 vote, the radicals failed to muster the two-thirds majority for Johnson’s removal. Seven independentminded Republican senators, courageously putting country above party, voted “not guilty.” Several factors shaped the outcome. Fears of creating a destabilizing precedent played a role, as did principled opposition to abusing the constitutional mechanism of checks and balances. Political considerations also ﬁgured conspicuously. As the vice presidency remained vacant under Johnson, his successor would have been radical Republican Benjamin Wade, the president pro tempore of the Senate. Wade was disliked by many members of the business community for his high-tariff, soft-money, pro-labor views and was distrusted by moderate Republicans. Meanwhile, Johnson indicated through his attorney that he would stop obstructing Republican policies in return for remaining in ofﬁce. Diehard radicals were infuriated by their failure to muster a two-thirds majority for Johnson’s removal. “The Country is going to the Devil!” cried the crippled Stevens as he was carried from the hall. But the nation, though violently aroused, accepted the verdict with a good temper that did credit to its political maturity. In a less stable republic, an armed uprising might have erupted against the president. The nation thus narrowly avoided a dangerous precedent that would have gravely weakened one of the three branches of the federal government. Johnson was clearly guilty of bad speeches, bad judgment, and bad temper, but not of “high crimes and misdemeanors.” From the standpoint of the radicals, his greatest crime had been to stand inﬂexibly in their path.

The Purchase of Alaska
 Johnson’s administration, though largely reduced to a ﬁgurehead, achieved its most enduring success in the ﬁeld of foreign relations. The Russians by 1867 were in a mood to sell the vast and chilly expanse of land now known as Alaska. They had already overextended themselves in North America, and they saw that in the likely event of another war with Britain, they probably would lose their defenseless northern province to the sea-dominant British. Alaska, moreover, had been ruthlessly “furred out” and was a growing economic liability. The Russians were therefore quite eager to unload their “frozen asset” on the Americans, and they put out seductive feelers in Washington. They preferred the United States to any

 Map 22.2 Alaska and the Lower Forty-eight States (a size comparison) Interactive Map

 other purchaser, primarily because they wanted to strengthen further the Republic as a barrier against their ancient enemy, Britain. In 1867 Secretary of State William Seward, an ardent expansionist, signed a treaty with Russia that transferred Alaska to the United States for the bargain price of $7.2 million (see Map 22.2). But Seward’s enthusiasm for these frigid wastes was not shared by his ignorant or uninformed countrymen, who jeered at Seward’s Folly, “Seward’s Icebox,” “Frigidia,” and “Walrussia.” The American people, still preoccupied with Reconstruction and other internal vexations, were economy-minded and anti-expansionist. Then why did Congress and the American public sanction the purchase? For one thing Russia, alone among the powers, had been conspicuously friendly to the North during the recent Civil War. Americans did not feel that they could offend their great and good friend, the tsar, by hurling his walrus-covered icebergs back into his face. Besides, the territory was rumored to be teeming with furs, ﬁsh, and gold, and it might yet “pan out” proﬁtably—as it later did with natural resources, including oil and gas. So Congress and the country accepted “Seward’s Polar Bear Garden,” somewhat derisively but nevertheless hopefully.

The Heritage of
Reconstruction
 Many white Southerners regarded Reconstruction as a more grievous wound than the war itself. It left a fes-

 Reconstruction's Legacy



 The Republicans acted from a mixture of idealism and political expediency. They wanted both to protect the freed slaves and to promote the fortunes of the Republican party. In the end their efforts backﬁ red badly. Reconstruction conferred only ﬂeeting beneﬁts on blacks and virtually extinguished the Republican party in the South for nearly one hundred years. Moderate Republicans never fully appreciated the extensive effort necessary to make the freed slaves completely independent citizens, nor the lengths to which Southern whites would go to preserve their system of racial dominance. Had Thaddeus Stevens’s radical program of drastic economic reforms and heftier protection of political rights been enacted, things might well have been different. But deep-seated racism, ingrained American resistance to tampering with property rights, and rigid loyalty to the principle of local self-government, combined with spreading indifference in the North to the plight of blacks, formed too formidable an obstacle. Despite good intentions by Republicans, the Old South was in many ways more resurrected than reconstructed.

 The remarkable ex-slave Frederick Douglass (1817?– 1895) wrote in 1882, Is This a Republican Form of Government? by Thomas Nast, Harper’s Weekly, 1876 The nation’s most prominent political cartoonist expressed his despair at the tragic way that Reconstruction had ended— with few real gains for the former slaves.

 tering scar that would take generations to heal. They resented the upending of their social and racial system, the political empowerment of blacks, and the insult of federal intervention in their local affairs. Yet few rebellions have ended with the victors sitting down to a love feast with the vanquished. Given the explosiveness of the issues that had caused the war, and the bitterness of the ﬁghting, the wonder is that Reconstruction was not far harsher than it was. The fact is that Lincoln, Johnson, and most Republicans had no clear picture at war’s end of what federal policy toward the South should be. Policymakers groped for the right policies, inﬂuenced as much by Southern responses to defeat and emancipation as by any plans of their own to impose a speciﬁc program on the South.

“


 Though slavery was abolished, the wrongs of my people were not ended. Though they were not slaves, they were not yet quite free. No man can be truly free whose liberty is dependent upon the thought, feeling, and action of others, and who has himself no means in his own hands for guarding, protecting, defending, and maintaining that liberty. Yet the Negro after his emancipation was precisely in this state of destitution. . . . He was free from the individual master, but the slave of society. He had neither money, property, nor friends. He was free from the old plantation, but he had nothing but the dusty road under his feet. He was free from the old quarter that once gave him shelter, but a slave to the rains of summer and the frosts of winter. He was, in a word, literally turned loose, naked, hungry, and destitute, to the open sky.

”




Chapter 22 The Ordeal of Reconstruction, 1865–1877


 CHRONOLOGY

 Lincoln announces “10 percent” Reconstruction plan



 Lincoln vetoes Wade-Davis Bill



 Lincoln assassinated Johnson issues Reconstruction proclamation Congress refuses to seat Southern congressmen Freedmen’s Bureau established Southern states pass Black Codes



 Congress passes Civil Rights Bill over Johnson’s veto Congress passes Fourteenth Amendment Johnson-backed candidates lose congressional election Ex parte Milligan case Ku Klux Klan founded

KEY TERMS
Freedmen’s Bureau (518) “10 percent” Reconstruction plan (519) Wade-Davis Bill (519) Black Codes (521) Paciﬁc Railroad Act (522) Civil Rights Bill (522) Fourteenth Amendment (523) Reconstruction Act (525) Fifteenth Amendment (526) 


Reconstruction Act
 Tenure of Ofﬁce Act United States purchases Alaska from Russia



 Johnson impeached and acquitted Johnson pardons Confederate leaders



 Fifteenth Amendment ratiﬁed

1870–


Force Acts




 Freedmen’s Bureau ended



 Reconstruction ends

PEOPLE TO KNOW
Ex parte Milligan (526) Redeemers (527) Woman’s Loyal League (527) Union League (527) scalawags (528) carpetbaggers (528) Ku Klux Klan (529) Force Acts (530) Tenure of Ofﬁce Act (531) Seward’s Folly (532) 
Oliver O. Howard
Andrew Johnson
Thaddeus Stevens
Hiram Revels


Edwin M. Stanton
Benjamin Wade
William Seward


How Radical Was Reconstruction?


F


 ew topics have triggered as much intellectual warfare as the “dark and bloody ground” of Reconstruction. The period provoked questions—sectional, racial, and constitutional—about which people felt

 deeply and remain deeply divided even today. Scholarly argument goes back conspicuously to a Columbia University historian, William A. Dunning, whose students in the early 1900s published a series of histories

Varying Viewpoints


 of the Reconstruction South. Dunning and his disciples were inﬂuenced by the turn-of-the-century spirit of sectional conciliation as well as by current theories about black racial inferiority. Sympathizing with the white South, they wrote about the Reconstruction period as a kind of national disgrace, foisted upon a prostrate region by vindictive and self-seeking radical Republican politicians. If the South had wronged the North by seceding, the North had wronged the South by reconstructing. A second cycle of scholarship in the 1920s was impelled by a widespread suspicion that the Civil War itself had been a tragic and unnecessary blunder. Attention now shifted to Northern politicians. Scholars like Howard Beale further questioned the motives of the radical Republicans. To Beale and others, the radicals had masked a ruthless desire to exploit Southern labor and resources behind a false front of “concern” for the freed slaves. Moreover, Northern advocacy of black voting rights was merely a calculated attempt to ensure a Republican political presence in the defeated South. The unfortunate Andrew Johnson, in this view, had valiantly tried to uphold constitutional principles in the face of this cynical Northern onslaught. Although ignored by his contemporaries, scholar, black nationalist, and founder of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People W. E. B. Du Bois wrote a sympathetic history of Reconstruction in 1935 that became the basis for historians’ interpretations ever since. Following World War II, Kenneth Stampp and others, inﬂuenced by the modern civil rights movement, built on Du Bois’s argument and claimed that Reconstruction had been a noble though ultimately failed attempt to extend American principles of equity and justice. The radical Republicans and the carpetbaggers were now heroes, whereas Andrew Johnson was castigated for his obsti-



 nate racism. By the early 1970s, this view had become orthodoxy, and it generally holds sway today. Yet some scholars, such as Michael Benedict and Leon Litwack, disillusioned with the inability to achieve full racial justice in the 1960s and 1970s, began once more to scrutinize the motives of Northern politicians immediately after the Civil War. They claimed to discover that Reconstruction had never been very radical and that the Freedmen’s Bureau and other agencies had merely allowed white planters to maintain their dominance over local politics as well as over the local economy. More recently, Eric Foner has powerfully reasserted the argument that Reconstruction was a truly radical and noble attempt to establish an interracial democracy. Drawing upon the work of Du Bois, Foner has emphasized the comparative approach to American Reconstruction. Clearly, Foner has admitted, Reconstruction did not create full equality, but it did allow blacks to form political orga ni zations and churches, to vote, and to establish some mea sure of economic independence. In South Africa, the Caribbean, and other areas once marked by slavery, these opportunities were much harder to come by. Many of the beneﬁts of Reconstruction were erased by whites in the South during the Gilded Age, but in the twentieth century, the constitutional principles and organizations developed during Reconstruction provided the focus and foundation for the modern civil rights movement—which some have called the second Reconstruction. Steven Hahn’s A Nation Under Our Feet: Black Political Struggles in the Rural South from Slavery to the Great Migration (2003) is the latest contribution to the literature on Reconstruction. Hahn emphasizes the assertiveness and ingenuity of African Americans in creating new political opportunities for themselves after emancipation.

To Learn More
Richard N. Current, Those Terrible Carpetbaggers (1988)
Eric Foner, Forever Free: The Story of Emancipation and
Reconstruction (2005)
———, Nothing but Freedom (1983)
Dewey W. Grantham, Life and Death of the Solid South
(1988)
Steven Hahn, A Nation Under Our Feet: Black Political
 Struggles in the Rural South from Slavery to the Great Migration (2003) James M. McPherson, Ordeal by Fire: The Civil War and Reconstruction (1981) Michael Perman, Emancipation and Reconstruction (rev. ed., 2003)

Lawrence Powell, New Masters: Northern Planters During
 the Civil War and Reconstruction (1980) Julie Saville, The Work of Reconstruction (1994) Booker T. Washington, Up from Slavery (1901) Heather Andrea Williams, Self-Taught: African American Education in Slavery and Freedom (2005) A complete, annotated bibliography for this chapter—along with brief descriptions of the People to Know and additional review materials—may be found at www.cengage.com/history/kennedy/ampageant14e

 PART

 FOUR

Forging an
Industrial Society





1865–1909


A


 nation of farmers fought the Civil War in the 1860s. By the time the Spanish-American War broke out in 1898, America was an industrial nation. For generations Americans had plunged into the wilderness and plowed their ﬁelds. Now they settled in cities and toiled in factories. Between the Civil War and the century’s end, economic and technological change came so swiftly and massively that it seemed to many Americans that a whole new civilization had emerged. In some ways it had. The sheer scale of the new industrial society was dazzling. Transcontinental railroads knit the country together from sea to sea. New industries like oil and steel grew to staggering size— and made megamillionaires out of entrepreneurs like oilman John D. Rockefeller and steel maker Andrew Carnegie.

 Drawn by the allure of industrial employment, Americans moved to the city, much like their counterparts in industrializing Europe, Russia, and Japan. In 1860 only about 20 percent of the population were city dwellers. By 1900 that proportion doubled, as rural Americans and European immigrants alike ﬂocked to mill town and metropolis in search of steady jobs. These sweeping changes challenged the spirit of individualism that Americans had celebrated since the seventeenth century. Even on the western frontier, that historic bastion of rugged loners, the hand of government was increasingly felt, as large armies were dispatched to subdue the Plains Indians and federal authority was invoked to regulate the use of natural resources. The rise of powerful monopolies called into question the government’s traditional hands-off policy

 Factory Workers, with Railroad Spikes, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania, 1898 Immigrant and native-born workers alike bent their backs to build industrial America.

Forging an Industrial Society


 toward business, and a growing band of reformers increasingly clamored for government regulation of private enterprise. The mushrooming cities, with their need for transport systems, schools, hospitals, sanitation, and ﬁ re and police protection, required bigger governments and budgets than an earlier generation could have imagined. As never before, Americans struggled to adapt old ideals of private autonomy to the new realities of industrial civilization. With economic change came social and political turmoil. Labor violence brought bloodshed to places such as Chicago and Homestead, Pennsylvania. Small farmers, squeezed by debt and foreign competition, rallied behind the People’s, or “Populist,” party, a radical movement of the 1880s and 1890s that attacked the power of Wall Street, big business, and the banks. Antiimmigrant sentiment swelled. Bitter disputes over tariffs and monetary policy deeply divided the country, setting debtors against lenders, farmers against manufacturers, the West and South against the Northeast. And in this unfamiliar era of big money and expanding government, corruption ﬂourished, from town hall to Congress, fueling loud cries for political reform. The bloodiest conﬂ ict of all pitted Plains Indians against the relentless push of westward expansion. As railroads drove their iron arrows through the heart of the West, the Indians lost their land and life-sustaining buffalo herds. By the 1890s, after three decades of ﬁerce ﬁghting with the U.S. Army, the Indians who had once



 roamed across the vast rolling prairies were struggling to preserve their shattered cultures within the conﬁ nement of reservations. The South remained the one region largely untouched by the Industrial Revolution sweeping the rest of America. A few sleepy southern hamlets did become boomtowns, but for the most part, the South’s rural way of life remained unperturbed. The post-emancipation era inﬂ icted new forms of racial injustice on African Americans, the vast majority of whom continued to live in the Old South. State legislatures systematically deprived black Americans of their political rights, including the right to vote. Segregation of schools, housing, and all kinds of public facilities made a mockery of African Americans’ Reconstruction-era hopes for equality before the law. The new wealth and power of industrial America nurtured a growing sense of national self-conﬁdence. Literature ﬂowered, and a golden age of philanthropy dawned. The reform spirit spread. So did a restless appetite for overseas expansion. In a brief war against Spain in 1898, the United States, born in a revolutionary war of independence and long the champion of democratic rights, seized control of the Philippines and itself became an imperial power. Uncle Sam’s venture into empire touched off a bitter national debate about America’s role in the world and ushered in a long period of argument over the responsibilities, at home as well as abroad, of a modern industrial state.

Dearborn Street, Chicago
Loop, Around 1900
 “America is energetic, but Chicago is in a fever,” marveled a visiting Englishman about turn-of-thecentury Chicago. Street scenes like this were common in America’s booming new cities, especially in the “Lord of the Midwest.”

Political Paralysis
 in the Gilded Age




1869–1896
 Grant . . . had no right to exist. He should have been extinct for ages. . . . That, two thousand years after Alexander the Great and Julius Caesar, a man like Grant should be called—and should actually and truly be— the highest product of the most advanced evolution, made evolution ludicrous. . . . The progress of evolution, from President Washington to President Grant, was alone evidence enough to upset Darwin. . . . Grant . . . should have lived in a cave and worn skins. HENRY ADAMS, THE EDUCATION OF HENRY ADAMS, 1907

T


 he population of the post–Civil War Republic continued to vault upward by vigorous leaps, despite the awful bloodletting in both Union and Confederate ranks. Census takers reported over 39 million people in 1870, a gain of 26.6 percent over the preceding decade, as the immigrant tide surged again. The United States was now the third-largest nation in the Western world, ranking behind Russia and France. But the civic health of the United States did not keep pace with its physical growth. The Civil War and its aftermath spawned waste, extravagance, speculation, and graft. Disillusionment ran deep among idealistic Americans in the postwar era. They had spilled their blood for the Union, emancipation, and Abraham

 Lincoln, who had promised “a new birth of freedom.” Instead they got a bitter dose of corruption and political stalemate—beginning with Ulysses S. Grant, a great soldier but an utterly inept politician.

The “Bloody Shirt”
Elects Grant
 Wrangling between Congress and President Andrew Johnson had soured the people on professional politicians in the Reconstruction era, and the notion still prevailed that a good general would make a good president. Stubbly-bearded General Grant was by far the

 This icon will direct you to interactive activities and study materials on The American Pageant website: www.cengage.com/history/kennedy/ampageant14e



The Stain of Corruption


 most popular northern hero to emerge from the war. Grateful citizens of Philadelphia, Washington, and his hometown of Galena, Illinois, passed the hat and in each place presented him with a house. New Yorkers tendered him a check for $105,000. The general, silently pufﬁ ng on his cigar, unapologetically accepted these gifts as his just deserts for having rescued the Union. Grant was a hapless greenhorn in the political arena. His one presidential vote had been cast for the Democratic ticket in 1856. A better judge of horseﬂesh than of humans, his cultural background was breathtakingly narrow. He once reportedly remarked that Venice (Italy) would be a ﬁ ne city if only it were drained. The Republicans, freed from the Union party coalition of war days, enthusiastically nominated Grant for the presidency in 1868. The party’s platform sounded a clarion call for continued Reconstruction of the South under the glinting steel of federal bayonets. Yet Grant, always a man of few words, struck a highly popular note in his letter of acceptance when he said, “Let us have peace.” This noble sentiment became a leading campaign slogan and was later engraved on his tomb beside the Hudson River. Expectant Democrats, meeting in their own nominating convention, denounced military Reconstruction but could agree on little else. Wealthy eastern delegates demanded a plank promising that federal war bonds be redeemed in gold—even though many of the bonds had been purchased with badly depreciated paper greenbacks. Poorer midwestern delegates answered with the “Ohio Idea,” which called for redemption in greenbacks. Debt-burdened agrarian Democrats thus hoped to keep more money in circulation and keep interest rates lower. This dispute introduced a bitter contest over monetary policy that continued to convulse the Republic until the century’s end. Midwestern delegates got the platform but not the candidate. The nominee, former New York governor Horatio Seymour, scuttled the Democrats’ faint hope for success by repudiating the Ohio Idea. Republicans whipped up enthusiasm for Grant by energetically “waving the bloody shirt”—that is, reviving gory memories of the Civil War—which became for the ﬁ rst time a prominent feature of a presidential campaign.* “Vote

 *The expression is said to have derived from a speech by Representative Benjamin F. Butler of Massachusetts, who allegedly waved before the House the bloodstained nightshirt of a Klan-ﬂogged carpetbagger.



 as You Shot” was a powerful Republican slogan aimed at Union army veterans. Grant won, with 214 electoral votes to 80 for Seymour. But the former general scored a majority of only 300,000 in the popular vote (3,013,421 to 2,706,829). Most white voters apparently supported Seymour, and the ballots of three still-unreconstructed southern states (Mississippi, Texas, and Virginia) were not counted at all. An estimated 500,000 former slaves gave Grant his margin of victory. To remain in power, the Republican party somehow had to continue to control the South—and to keep the ballot in the hands of the grateful freedmen. Republicans could not take future victories “for Granted.”

The Era of Good Stealings
 A few skunks can pollute a large area. Although the great majority of businesspeople and government ofﬁcials continued to conduct their affairs with decency and honor, the whole postwar at mosphere stunk of corruption. The Man in the Moon, it was said, had to hold his nose when passing over America. Freewheeling railroad promoters sometimes left gullible bond buyers with only “two streaks of rust and a right of way.” Unethical stock-market manipulators were a cinder in the public eye. Too many judges and legislators put their power up for hire. Cynics deﬁ ned an honest politician as one who, when bought, would stay bought. Notorious in the ﬁ nancial world were two millionaire partners, “Jubilee Jim” Fisk and Jay Gould. The corpulent and unscrupulous Fisk provided the “brass,” while the undersized and cunning Gould provided the brains. The crafty pair concocted a plot in 1869 to corner the gold market. Their slippery game would work only if the federal Treasury refrained from selling gold. The conspirators worked on President Grant directly and also through his brother-in-law, who received $25,000 for his complicity. For weeks Fisk and Gould madly bid the price of gold skyward, so they could later proﬁt from its heightened value. But on “Black Friday” (September 24, 1869), the bubble broke when the Treasury, contrary to Grant’s supposed assurances, was compelled to release gold. The price of gold plunged, and scores of honest businesspeople were driven to the wall. A congressional probe concluded that Grant had done nothing crooked, though he had acted stupidly and indiscreetly. The infamous Tweed Ring in New York City vividly displayed the ethics (or lack of ethics) typical of the



